 We now have 4-month-old mice that are not diabetic when they were previously diabetic.
 Dr Ehud Ur, professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and president of the Canadian Diabetes Association, warned that research was still in its early days.
 Like other experts, he is sceptical about the possibility of curing diabetes, noting that these results are not applicable to people who are already suffering from type 1 diabetes.
 Monday, on a radio broadcast on Sveriges Radio in Sweden, Sara Danius, the permanent Secretary of the Swedish Academy's Nobel Committee, publicly announced that the committee, unable to directly contact Bob Dylan about the 2016 Nobel Prize in Literature, had given up trying to contact him.
 Danius said, I have called and sent Emails to his closest collaborator and I have received very friendly replies. For the moment, that's certainly enough.
 Previously, Ring's CEO, Jamie Siminoff, noted that he launched the company when the Bell at his front door was not audible from his garage store.
 He says he's designed a Wi-Fi doorbell.
 Siminoff said sales have increased after his appearance in 2013 on an episode of Shark Tank where the show's panel refused to fund the start-up.
 In late 2017, Siminoff appeared on the QVC television shopping channel.
 Ring also settled a lawsuit with a competing security company, the ADT Corporation.
 Even though an experimental vaccine seems so far capable of reducing the mortality rate of Ebola, no cure has yet been sufficiently effective to treat the existing infection.
 Even though the administration of a cocktail of antibodies, ZMapp, had initially shown promising signs on the ground, formal studies have demonstrated that its capacity to limit deaths did not meet expectations.
 In the PALM trial, ZMapp served as a control, meaning that scientists used it as a baseline and compared it to the other three treatments.
 The American gymnastics Federation supports the letter from the U S . Olympic Committee and accepts the absolute necessity of the Olympic family to promote a safe environment for all our athletes.
 We agree with the statement of the U.S. Olympic Committee that the interests of our athletes and clubs, as well as their sport, could be better served by going forward and making significant changes within our organization, rather than revoking accreditation.
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent investigation that could shed light on how the abuse of the proportion so courageously described by survivors of Larry Nassar could have gone unnoticed for so long and adopts any necessary and appropriate change.
 USA Gymnastics and the U.S. Olympic Committee have the same goal: to make gymnastics, and other sports, as safe as possible so that athletes can pursue their dreams in a safe, positive and accountable environment.
 Throughout the 1960s, Brzezinski worked for John F. Kennedy as a counselor, then for the administration of Lyndon B. Johnson.
 During the Ames Straw Poll in August, he advised Carter on foreign policy, then was a National Security Advisor from 1977 to 1981, succeeding Henry Kissinger.
 During his time at the NSA, he helped Carter to resolve diplomatically international issues such as the Camp David accords, in 1978, the normalization of relations between the United States and China in the late 1970s, the Iranian revolution and its consequences such as the Iran hostage crisis, in 1979, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan, in 1979.
 The film, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, received nominations in all the major categories.
 Golsling and Stone were respectively nominated for Best Actor and Best Actress.
 Among the other nominations are those for best film, best director, best cinematography, best costumes, best editing, best original music, best production design, best sound mixing, best editing and best original screenplay.
 Two songs from the film, Audition (The Fools Who Dream) and City of Stars, were nominated for best original song.
 Late Sunday, U S . President Donald Trump, in a statement made through the Secretary of State, announced that American troops would be withdrawing from Syria.
 The announcement came after Mr . Trump had a phone conversation with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 Turkey would also take charge of the guard of captured ISIS fighters that, according to the declaration, European nations have refused to repatriate.
 This confirms not only that at least some dinosaurs had feathers, a theory already widely accepted, but provides details that fossils generally cannot provide, such as color and three-dimensional arrangement.
 Scientists say that the bird's plumage was Brownish on the upper side and pale or carotenoid on the underside.
 This discovery also allows us to better understand the evolution of feathers in birds.
 Given that dinosaur feathers do not have a fully developed rachis, but show other characteristics proper to feathers—barbs and barbules—researchers have deduced that the rachis was probably a later developmental evolution of these other characteristics.
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used in flight but rather for regulation or temperature display, and the researchers have suggested that even though it is the tail of a young dinosaur, the sample shows adult plumage and not the down of a chick.
 Scientists say that this is certainly the tail of a juvenile dinosaur, but the sample reveals a plumage belonging to an adult, not a young one.
 A car bomb exploded at the headquarters of the police in Gaziantep, Turkey, this morning, killing two police officers and injuring more than twenty others.
 The governor's office said that nine of the injured were police officers.
 Police have said they suspect a Daesh militant as the suspect behind the attack.
 They found that the sun worked on the same basic principles as other stars, the activity of all the stars in the system being determined by their luminosity, their rotation and nothing else.
 Luminosity and rotation are used together to determine the Rossby number of a star, which is linked to the plasma flow.
 In terms of magnetic inversions, the smaller the number of Rossby waves, the less active the star.
 Iwasaki had problems on his voyage, Iwasaki had problems on his voyage, Iwasaki had problems on his voyage,
 It has been stolen by pirates, attacked in Tibet by a rabid dog, escaped a marriage in Nepal and been arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard works on both the 2.4 GHz and 5.0 GHz frequencies.
 This will allow backwards compatibility with 802.11a, b and g, provided the station has two radios.
 The speeds of the Wi-Fi 802.11n standard are significantly faster than those of its predecessors, with a theoretical maximum bit rate of 600 Mbit/s.
 Duvall, who is married and has two adult children, did not make a good impression on Miller, to whom the story was related.
 When asked to comment, Miller said,
 We will strive to reduce carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP significantly by 2020 compared to the level of 2005, said Hu.
 He did not quantify these reductions, saying that they will be based on Chinese economic production.
 Hu has encouraged developing countries to avoid the old method of polluting first and cleaning up later.
 He added that, “We should not, however, ask them to assume obligations that go beyond their stage of development, their responsibility and their capacities.
 The Iraq study group presented its report today at 12 GMT.
 He warned that no one can guarantee that any action in Iraq at this stage will end sectarian war, rising violence or slide towards chaos.
 The report opens with a call for an open debate and a consensus in the United States on the policy towards the Middle East.
 The report is very critical of almost every aspect of the government's current policy towards Iraq and strongly argues for a change of direction immediately.
 The first of its 78 recommendations is that a new diplomatic initiative should be taken before the end of the year to secure Iraq's borders against hostile interventions and to re-establish diplomatic relations with its neighbours.
 The current Senator and First Lady of Argentina, Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, announced her Presidential candidacy last night in La Plata, a city located 50 kilometers (31 miles) from Buenos Aires.
 Kirchner announced her intention to run for the Presidency at the Teatro Argentino, the same place where she began her 2005 campaign for the Senate as a member of the Buenos Aires delegation.
 The debate was sparked by controversy over spending on relief and reconstruction following Hurricane Katrina, which some conservative budget hawks have humorously called the Bush Agreement for New Orleans.
 Critics of the liberal effort to rebuild concentrated on the awarding of reconstruction contracts to people perceived as insiders of Washington.
 More than 4,000,000 people attended the funeral.
 In view of the large number of people present, it was not possible for everyone to attend the funeral on St . Peter's square.
 Several large television screens were set up at different locations in Rome to allow people to watch the ceremony.
 In many other cities in Italy and in the rest of the world, in particular in Poland, similar installations have been realized and have been seen by a great number of people.
 Historians have criticized the FBI's past policies for concentrating resources on easy cases, in particular car theft cases, with the intention of increasing the agency's success rate.
 Congress launched funding for the Initiative against Pornography in the course of the fiscal year 2005, while specifying that the FBI was preparing to assign ten agents to the fight against adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa scored the highest score of the matches, 70 runs in only 41 balls, hitting 11 four runs and 2 six runs.
 The middle order batters, Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, have obtained good results and have accomplished a century together.
 But after losing the guichet of his captain, India had only completed 36 races and lost seven guichets until the end of the manche.
 President George W . Bush arrived in Singapore on the morning of November 16, beginning a week-long tour of Asia.
 He was welcomed by Wong Kan Seng, the vice-premier of Singapore, and discussed trade and terrorism with Lee Hsien Loong, the Prime Minister of Singapore.
 After seven days of midterm election defeats, Bush made part of his plan to expand trade in Asia.
 Prime Minister Stephen Harper has agreed to send the government's Clean Air Act to a multipartite committee for review, before its second reading, after a 25-minute meeting Tuesday with NDP leader Jack Layton at the PMO.
 Layton had asked for changes to the Conservatives' environmental bill at the meeting with the Prime Minister, asking for a complete and thorough reformulation of the Conservative environmental bill.
 And since then, the Federal Government has taken the lead in funding the Mersey Hospital at Devonport in Tasmania, and some state and Federal politicians have called it a farce in the lead up to the November election.
 But Prime Minister John Howard said the law was only aimed at preventing the hospital's facilities from being downgraded by the Tasmanian government, by giving it an extra 45 million Australian dollars.
 According to the latest bulletin, tide gauge readings indicate that a tsunami has occurred. A tsunami event was recorded near Pago Pago and Niue.
 No serious damage or injury was reported in Tonga, but electricity was temporarily cut, which would have prevented the Tongan authorities from receiving the tsunami warning issued by the Pacific Tsunami Warning Centre.
 Fourteen Hawaii schools located on or near the coasts were closed all day Wednesday despite the lifting of alerts.
 The American President George W . Bush welcomed this announcement with satisfaction.
 Bush spokesman Gordon Johndroe called the promise from North Korea a major step toward the goal of verifiable denuclearization of the Korean peninsula.
 Subtropical storm Jerry, the 10th named storm of the hurricane season, appeared this day in the Atlantic ocean.
 The National Hurricane Center says at this stage, Jerry poses no threat to land.
 According to the U.S. Corps of Engineers, a rainfall of 6 inches could open a breach in previously damaged levees.
 The ninth district, which experienced flooding of up to 20 feet during Hurricane Katrina, is currently under water up to the size of the levee.
 Water is pouring over the dike in a section 100 feet wide.
 In his speech on Wikinews last month, Adam Cuerden, director of Commons, expressed his frustration at the deletions that had been made.
 Wales had lied to us from the beginning, first by pretexting legal reasons, then by pretending to listen to us until he had deleted his work.
 The community's discontent led to the current efforts to design a policy regarding the sexually explicit content of the site that hosts millions of free media.
 The work done was principally theoretical, but the program was written to simulate the observations made of the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The effect the team was looking for would be caused by the tidal forces between the dark matter in the Galaxy and the dark matter in the Milky Way.
 Just as the moon exerts a tug on the earth, causing tides, the Milky Way exerts a force on the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 Scientists have been able to conclude that dark matter affects other dark matter in the same way that normal matter affects normal matter.
 According to this theory, the majority of the dark matter around a Galaxy is found in a sort of halo, and is made up of a large number of small particles.
 Television reports show white smoke coming from the factory.
 Local authorities warn the inhabitants of the surrounding areas to stay indoors, to turn off air conditioners and not to drink tap water.
 According to the Japanese nuclear agency, radioactive cesium and iodine have been identified at the plant.
 The authorities assume that this means the uranium fuel reservoirs on the site contain cracks and leaks.
 Dr Tony Moll discovered Multi-Resistant TB in the South African region of KwaZulu-Natal.
 In an interview, he said the new mutation was ""very troubling and alarming in light of the very high mortality rate""
 Some patients would have contracted the virus at the hospital, according to Dr Moll, and at least two of them were part of the hospital staff.
 Over a one-year period, an infected person can infect 10 to 15 close contacts.
 However, the percentage of TB-UR in the overall group of people with TB still seems low, with 6,000 people out of a total of 330,000 having been infected at some point in South Africa.
 The satellites, which weighed both more than 450 kg and moved at about 28,000 km/h, collided at 790 km above the earth.
 Scientists say the explosion caused by the collision was massive.
 We're still trying to figure out how big the accident was and how the earth will be affected.
 The strategic command of the United States Department of Defense follows the debris.
 The result of the trace analysis will be published on a public Website.
 A doctor working at the children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, has been charged with murder after his mother was found dead in the trunk of her car on Wednesday, according to Ohio authorities.
 Dr Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found lying on the roadside in Blue Ash, Ohio, a suburb about 15 miles north of Cincinnati, wearing a T-shirt and underwear, in an apparently very medicated state.
 She directed the officers to her Oldsmobile Intrigue, which was 500 feet away.
 There, they found the body of Saroja Balasubramanian, 53, covered in blood-stained blankets.
 The police said it would seem that the body had been there for a day or so.
 The first cases of this seasonal disease were reported at the end of July.
 Pigs are carriers of the disease, which is then transmitted to humans by mosquitoes.
 The epidemic has incited the Indian government to take measures such as deploying pig collectors in the heavily affected areas, distributing thousands of mosquito nets and spraying pesticides.
 Several million vaccine doses against encephalitis have also been promised by the government, which will help prepare health agencies for next year.
 Plans for delivering vaccines in historically hardest-hit areas this year have been delayed due to a lack of funds and a low priority given to these diseases compared to other ones.
 In 1956, Słania settled in Sweden, where three years later he began working for the Swedish Postal Service as its chief engraver.
 He has produced more than 1,000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries.
 His work is of such quality and of such a level of detail that he is one of the few philatelists well known to the general public.
 His one thousandth stamp was the magnificent “Great Deeds by Swedish Kings” by David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl in 2000, which is featured in the Guinness book of records.
 He has also engraved bank notes for many countries, including the portraits of the Prime Minister on the new Canadian 5 and 100 dollar bills.
 Gibson was transported to the hospital, but succumbed immediately after.
 The driver of the truck, a 64-year-old man, was not injured in the accident.
 The vehicle itself was removed from the scene of the accident at approximately 12:00 GMT the same day.
 An employee of a garage near the scene of the accident said,
 They all returned in a hurry from the place where the accident had occurred.
 Among the other issues on the agenda in Bali are safeguarding the world's last forests and sharing technologies to help developing countries grow in a less polluting way.
 The UN hopes to finalise a fund to help countries hit by climate change to deal with the impacts.
 The money could be used to build houses that are resistant to flooding, to better manage water and to diversify crops.
 Fluke wrote that efforts by some to prevent women from talking about their health have failed.
 She arrived at this conclusion thanks to the multiple positive comments and encouragements she received from both women and men on the importance of considering contraception as a necessity.
 Once the fight was over, after the injured were taken to the infirmary, about 40 of the remaining inmates stayed in the courtyard, refusing to return to their cells.
 The negotiators have tried to rectify the situation, but the prisoners' demands are not clear.
 Between 22 h 00 and 23 h 00 MDT, the inmates lit a fire in the courtyard.
 Soon, officers equipped with anti-riot gear entered the courtyard and coaxed the detainees with tear gas.
 The firefighters team finally extinguished the fire at 23:35.
 After the construction of the dam in 1963, seasonal flooding that was supposed to spread sediments into the river was stopped.
 This sediment was necessary for the creation of sand banks and beaches, which served as habitats for fauna.
 Two species of fish have disappeared and two others are in danger of extinction, including the chevesne à bosse.
 Although the water level will only rise a few metres after the flood, authorities hope that this will be enough to restore the eroded sandbanks downstream.
 No tsunami alert was issued and, according to the Jakarta geophysics agency, no tsunami alert will be issued because the earthquake did not reach the required magnitude of 6.5.
 Despite the absence of a tsunami risk, residents began to panic and left their homes and businesses.
 Despite the tears shed during her farewells, Oprah Winfrey has clearly said to her fans that she will be back.
 It's not a goodbye, it's a page turning, and another one opening.
 The final results of the Namibian Presidential and Parliamentary elections indicate that the incumbent President, Hifikepunye Pohamba, was re-elected by a large majority.
 The ruling party, the South West African People's Organisation (SWAPO), also managed to retain a majority in the legislative elections.
 The coalition and Afghan troops moved into the area to secure the site and a plane from another coalition was sent to assist.
 The accident took place in mountainous terrain, and it seems that it was caused by a malicious fire.
 Efforts to find the scene of the accident are restricted by inclement weather and the rough terrain.
 According to the NGO, Médecins Sans Frontières and the World Health Organisation, it is the worst outbreak recorded in the country.
 The spokesman for Doctors Without Borders, Richard Veerman, said, quote,
 The matches began at 10 a.m. with beautiful weather and, apart from the mid-morning shower that quickly dissipated, it was a perfect day for Rugby Sevens.
 South Africa, at the top of the rankings, started on a good note by beating Zambia, 5th in the rankings, 26-0.
 South Africa, which had looked decidedly rusty in its match against its Southern counterparts, gradually improved as the tournament went on.
 Their disciplined defense, their adroitness in controlling the ball and their formidable teamwork enabled them to distinguish themselves and it was evident that they were the team to beat.
 The officials of the city of Amsterdam and the Anne Frank museum say the tree is infected with a fungus and poses a public health hazard, because they say there is an immediate danger of falling.
 He was due to be shot on Tuesday, but was saved following an urgent court decision.
 All the entrances to the caves, which have been baptized as the seven sisters, have a diameter of at least 100 to 250 meters.
 Infrared images reveal, based on variations in temperature day and night, that these are probably caves.
 They are fresher than the surrounding surface during the day and warmer at night.
 Their thermal behavior is not as stable as that of the planet's large caves, which maintain a constant temperature, but they resemble them in that they are deep holes in the earth, according to Glen Cushing, a member of the U S . Geological Survey and the staff of the University of Arizona, located in Flagstaff, Arizona.
 In France, voting is traditionally a low-tech experience: voters isolate themselves in a booth, put in a pre-printed paper indicating the candidate of their choice.
 After the agents have verified the voter's identity, the voter throws the envelope into the urn and signs their voter card.
 The French electoral code regulates the operations quite strictly.
 Since 1988, urns must be transparent so that voters and observers can see that no envelopes are present at the beginning of the vote and that no envelopes are added except those of duly counted and authorized voters.
 Candidates can send representatives to assist at each stage of the process, and the votes are counted by volunteers under high surveillance, according to specific procedures.
 The ASUS Eee PC, launched previously worldwide for reasons of economy and functionality, became a burning subject during the Taipei IT Month of 2007.
 But the market for laptops will be profoundly disrupted and diversified after ASUS was awarded the Taiwan Sustainable Award 2007 by the Executive Yuan of the Republic of China.
 The station's Website describes the show as a “Radio theatre of the old school with a new and scandalous Geek turn <Exclamationpoint>
 Initially, the show was only broadcast on the venerable Internet radio site TogiNet Radio, a site dedicated to spoken radio.
 In 2015, TogiNet created AstroNet Radio as a subsidiary station.
 Originally, the show featured amateur voice actors from East Texas.
 The widespread looting continued throughout the night, with police not present in the streets of Bichkek.
 An observer described Bichkek as being in a state of anarchy, as the population moved in bands through the streets and pillaged shops of consumer goods.
 Several Bichkek residents blamed the protesters in the south for the anarchy.
 South Africa beat the All Blacks (New Zealand) in a Tri-Nations Rugby match at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in Rustenburg, South Africa.
 The match was played to a point, 21 to 20, ending the All Blacks' 15-game winning streak.
 For the Springboks, it was the end of a five-match losing streak.
 It was the last match of the All Blacks, who had already won the trophy two weeks ago.
 The last match of the championship will take place at Johannesburg's Ellis Park next week when the Springboks face Australia.
 A moderate earthquake shook the West of Montana Monday at 22:08.
 The U S . Geological Survey and its National center for earthquake information did not receive immediate reports of damage.
 The epicenter of the earthquake was about 20 kilometers (15 miles) north and northeast of Dillon, and about 65 kilometers (40 miles) south of Butte.
 The strain of the deadly avian flu, H5N1, has been confirmed as having infected a dead wild duck found Monday in a marsh near Lyon in eastern France.
 France is the seventh EU country to suffer the impact of the virus, following Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 Suspected cases of H5N1 in Croatia and Denmark have not yet been confirmed.
 Chambers had sued God in court for the genocide, destruction and terror inflicted on millions and millions of earth's inhabitants.
 Chambers, an Angel, affirms that his trial is frivolous and that anyone can sue anyone.
 The story presented in the French opera, by Camille Saint-Saens, is that of an artist, whose life is dictated by his love for the drug and for Japan.
 As a result, artists smoke joints of cannabis on stage, and the theater itself encourages the public to join in.
 Newt Gingrich, the former Speaker of the House, Rick Perry, the governor of Texas, and Senator Michele Bachmann finished respectively in fourth, fifth, and sixth place.
 After publication of the results, Newt Gingrich congratulated Rick Santorum, but had harsh words for Mitt Romney, on whose behalf negative campaigns had been aired in Iowa against Newt Gingrich.
 Perry said he would return to Texas to evaluate the results of tonight's caucus and determine if there was a path for him in this race, but he affirmed later that he would remain in the race and participate in the January 21 primary in South Carolina.
 Bachmann, who had won the vote of paille in August, decided to put an end to his campaign.
 The photographer was transported to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he died as a result of his injuries.
 According to some sources, he would have been twenty years old. In a statement, Bieber said, quote,
 The site TMZ affirms that the photographer stopped his vehicle on the other side of Sepulveda Boulevard and attempted to take photos of the police stop before crossing the road and continuing, inciting the California Highway Patrol officer to order him to turn around, twice.
 According to police, it is unlikely that the driver of the vehicle that hit the photographer will face criminal prosecution.
 With only eighteen medals available per day, a number of countries failed to make it onto the podium of medal winners.
 They include the Netherlands, with Anna Jochemsen who finished ninth in the women's Super-G yesterday, and Finland, with Katja Saarinen who finished tenth in the same event.
 The Australian Mitchell Gourley was 11th in the men's Super-G, while Czech Oldrich Jelinek was 16th in the men's Super-G.
 The Mexican Arly Velasquez finished fifteenth in the men's Super-G, while the New Zealander Adam Hall finished ninth in the men's Super-G.
 The Polish blind skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska finished thirteenth in the Super-G. South Korean Jong Seork Park finished twenty-fourth in the men's Super-G.
 The UN peacekeepers, who arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake, are accused of spreading the disease that began near the troops' camp.
 According to the trial, the UN camp's waste was not properly treated, causing bacteria to enter the Artibonite River, one of Haiti's largest rivers.
 Before the troops arrived, Haiti had not encountered problems related to disease since the 1800s.
 The Haitian Institute for Justice and Democracy has referred to independent studies suggesting that the Nepalese UN peacekeeping battalion involuntarily brought the disease to Haiti.
 Danielle Lantagne, an UN expert on the disease, said the outbreak was probably caused by the blue helmets.
 Hamilton confirmed that the Howard University hospital had admitted the patient in a stable condition.
 The patient had traveled to Nigeria, where some cases of Ebola virus have occurred.
 The hospital respected the protocol for infection prevention, including isolating the patient to avoid any possible infection of other patients.
 Before the Simpsons, Simon had worked on several series, occupying various positions.
 During the 1980s, he worked on shows such as Taxi, Cheers and The Tracy Ullman Show.
 In 1989, he participated in the creation of the Simpsons with Brooks and Groening and was responsible for the hiring of the first team of writers for the series.
 Despite his departure from the show in 1993, he retained the title of executive producer and continued to receive tens of millions of dollars each season in royalties.
 The Chinese news agency Xinhua had previously announced the news of the hijacking of an airplane.
 Reports later revealed that the plane had been the subject of a bomb threat and was redirected to Kandahar, Afghanistan, to land.
 The first reports indicate that the plane was diverted to Afghanistan after being refused an emergency landing in Ürümqi.
 Air accidents are frequent in Iran, which has an ageing and poorly maintained fleet, both for civilian and military flights.
 In addition, because of international sanctions, it is not possible to buy new planes.
 At the beginning of this week, an accident involving a police helicopter killed three people and injured three others.
 Last month, Iran experienced its worst airline disaster in years when a plane heading to Armenia crashed, killing all 168 people on board.
 In the same month, another airliner made a runway excursion at Mashhad and hit a wall, killing seventeen people.
 The group Aerosmith has canceled the last concerts of its tour.
 The rock group was to tour the United States and Canada until September 16.
 They canceled the tour after singer Steven Tyler injured himself falling off stage during a concert on August 5.
 Murray lost the first set in a tie break after the two men held their service throughout the set.
 Despite Del Potro's net advantage during the second set, it took a tie-break once the score reached 6-6.
 Potro received at this moment care for his shoulder, but managed to return to the match.
 The program started at 20:30 local time (15:00 UTC).
 Famous singers in the whole country have presented bhajans, or devotional songs, at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 Sanju Sharma began the evening, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary. Lakkha Singh also presented the Chhappan Bhog bhajan, accompanied by Raju Khandelwal.
 Lakkha Singh then took the initiative to sing the bhajans.
 108 Chhappan Bhog plates (in Hinduism, 56 different edible foods, like sweets, fruits, nuts, dishes, etc, which are offered to the deity) were served to Baba Shyam.
 Lakkha Singh, too, presented the chhappan bhog bhajan, while being accompanied by the singer Raju Khandelwal.
 Thursday, during the main presentation of the Tokyo Game Show, Nintendo President Satoru Iwata unveiled the design of the new Nintendo Revolution Console of the company.
 Identical to a television remote control, the command uses two sensors placed near the user's television to triangulate its position in three-dimensional space.
 This will allow players to control actions and movements in video games by moving the device in the air.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and finished the race shortly after the start.
 His teammate Fernando Alonso dominated throughout the race, but his stop at the pit lane ended that domination, probably due to a loose right front wheel.
 Michael Schumacher finished his race shortly after Alonso, due to damage suffered to the suspension throughout the race.
 She is very pretty, and she sings very well too, he declared, according to a transcript of the press conference.
 I was moved every time we did a rehearsal on this subject, from the depths of my heart.
 About three minutes after launch, a camera showed numerous pieces of insulating foam breaking away from the fuel tank.
 They can see very well in the dark with night vision, and move very stealthily, too. Ocelots hunt their prey by blending in with their surroundings then pouncing on their prey.
 The head of NASA's shuttle program, N. Wayne Hale Jr, said the foam had fallen after the time that concerned us.
 Five minutes after the start of the exhibition, a wind starts to blow, reaching about one minute later the speed of 70 km/h, then rain comes, but so strong and so big that it hits your skin like a needle, then hail falls from the sky, people panic, cry and roll over each other.
 I lost my sister and her friend, and on my way there were two handicapped people in wheelchairs, people who were just jumping and pushing them.
 NHK also said that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was functioning normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co. reported no effect from the earthquake and that reactors number 1 and 2 at its Shika nuclear power plant had been shut down.
 We're perceiving the foster care system as a safety zone for these children.
 Some roads have been damaged, the rail service has been suspended in the affected areas, and Ishikawa Prefecture's Noto Airport is still closed.
 A bomb exploded in front of the governor's office.
 Three other bombs exploded near government buildings in the space of two hours.
 Some reports put the official death toll at eight, and official reports confirm that up to 30 people were injured, but the final figures are not yet known.
 Cyanuric acid and Melamine were discovered in urine samples taken from the domestic animals that died after ingesting contaminated pet food.
 The two compounds react with each other to form crystals that can block kidney function, the researchers said.
 Investigators discovered that crystals had formed in the urine of cats because of the presence of these supplements, melamine and cyanuric acid.
 The composition of these crystals corresponds to what is found in the urine of domestic animals affected when comparing by infrared spectroscopy.
 I do not know if you realize it, but most of the goods coming from Central America are exempt from taxes.
 Yet 80% of our goods were taxed by customs duties in the countries of Central America.
 This did not seem logical to me, it was certainly not just.
 All I say to the people is that you treat us as we treat you.
 The governor of California, Arnold Schwarzenegger, has signed a law that prohibits the sale or rental of violent Video games to minors.
 The law requires that violent Video games sold in the state of California be labeled with a sticker bearing the words,
 The director of public prosecutions, Kier Starmer QC, made a statement this morning announcing the prosecution of Huhne and Pryce.
 Huhne resigned and he will be replaced in the cabinet by Ed Davey, who will take over the role of Minister of State for Care and Support.
 Huhne and Pryce are due to appear before the Magistrates Court in Westminster on February 16.
 The victims are Nicholas Alden, 25, and Zachary Cuddeback, 21. Cuddeback was the driver.
 Edgar Veguilla was injured in the arm and jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider had to undergo reconstructive surgery for his face.
 Uka's weapon snapped as it was pointed at the head of a fifth man, Schneider suffered a lancinating pain, lost an eye, had part of his skull removed, and his face was reconstructed with titanium.
 Schneider testified via Video link from a U S . Air Force base in his home country.
 Besides Wednesday's event, Carpanedo participated in two individual races during the championships.
 She first participated in the slalom, where she obtained a Did Not Finish (DNF) in her first run. 36 of the 116 competitors obtained the same result in this run.
 Her other race, the giant slalom, allowed her to finish in tenth place of the women's group with a combined time of 4:41.30, or 2:11.60 minutes less than the Austrian Claudia Loesch, who finished first, and 1:09.02 minutes less than the Hungarian Gyöngyi Dani, who finished ninth.
 In the women's sitting category, four skiers failed to finish their run, and in the giant slalom, 45 skiers out of a total of 117 failed to finish.
 The Madhya Pradesh police have found the stolen laptop and mobile phone.
 The Inspector General D.K. Arya said, we have arrested five persons for having violated the Swiss national, and we have recovered her cell phone and laptop.
 The accused are Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar and Vishnu Kanjar.
 Chandra Shekhar Solanki, the police Commissioner, said the accused had their faces disguised when they appeared before the court.
 Although three people were present in the house when the car hit it, none were injured.
 However, the driver was seriously injured to the head.
 The road where the accident took place was temporarily barred to allow the rescue services to extract the driver of the red Audi TT.
 He was first hospitalised at the James Paget hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's hospital in Cambridge.
 Adekoya has since been charged with the murder of her son by the Sheriff Court in Edinburgh.
 She is in custody awaiting her trial and her hearing, but the eyewitness testimonies could be compromised because her picture has been widely circulated.
 This is a practice that is common elsewhere in the UK, but the Scottish justice system works differently and the courts considered that publishing the photos was potentially prejudicial.
 Professor Pamela Ferguson, of the University of Dundee, notes that, quote,
 The office of the Crown Prosecutor, which is in charge of all prosecutions, has told reporters that no other comment will be made at least until the charges are laid.
 According to the leak, the document will focus on the border dispute that Palestine claims based on the borders that existed before the 1967 Middle East war.
 Among other subjects discussed are the future of Jerusalem, which is sacred to both nations, and the question of the Jordan Valley.
 Israel demands a permanent military presence in the valley for a period of ten years from the signing of an agreement, while the Palestinian Authority only consents to a period of five years.
 The tire shooters of the supplemental parasite control were to be closely watched by rangers, because the test was controlled and its efficacy evaluated.
 In partnership with the Sporting Shooters Association of Australia (NSW) Inc, qualified volunteers have been recruited as part of the Sporting Shooters Association's hunting program.
 According to Mick O'Flynn, acting head of conservation of the park and heritage at the NPWS, the four shooters designated for the first culling campaign had been duly trained and briefed on safety.
 Martelly installed yesterday a new Provisional Electoral Council (CEP) composed of nine members.
 This is the fifth PEC of Martelly in four years.
 Last month, a Presidential Commission recommended the dissolution of the previous CEP as part of a set of measures aimed at engaging the country on the path to new elections.
 This Commission was Martelly's response to the vast protests against the regime that began in October.
 These protests, sometimes violent, were sparked by the absence of elections, some of which were due to take place in 2011.
 About 60 defective iPods were reported, causing a total of six fires and leaving four people with minor burns.
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) said it had been notified of 27 accidents linked to these devices.
 Last week, the METI announced that apple had informed them of 34 additional incidents, which the company has qualified as non-serious.
 The Ministry reacted by calling the report's delay by Apple, quote,
 The earthquake hit the Marianas at 7:19 a M local time (21:19 GMT Friday).
 The Marianas Islands Emergency Management Office said no damage had been reported in that country.
 In addition, the Pacific Tsunami Warning Center said there was no sign of a tsunami.
 An ex-Philippine policeman took hostages of Hong Kong tourists by hijacking their bus in Manila, the Philippines' capital.
 Rolando Mendoza fired with his M16 rifle at the tourists.
 Several hostages have been saved, and the death of at least six of them has been confirmed so far.
 Six hostages, including children and the elderly, were released prematurely, as were the Philippine photographers.
 The photographers then took the place of an elderly woman who needed to go to the toilet. Mendoza was shot.
 Liggins followed in his father's footsteps and embarked on a career as a doctor.
 He followed a training in Obstetrics, and began working at the National Women's Hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 When he was working at the hospital, Liggins began to investigate premature births in his spare time.
 His researches have demonstrated that if a hormone were administered, it would accelerate the pulmonary maturation of the baby.
 Xinhua reported that government investigators recovered two flight recorders, or black boxes, on Wednesday.
 The other wrestlers have also paid tribute to Luna.
 Tommy Dreamer said, “Luna was the first Queen of the extreme. My first manager. Luna passed away the night of two moons. A unique moment, just like her. A strong woman.
 Dustin Goldust Runnels commented that Luna was as bizarre as me,
 A poll of 1,400 people before the 2010 Federal Election revealed that the number of opponents to Australia becoming a Republic had increased by 8% since 2008.
 Prime Minister Julia Gillard has stated during the 2010 Federal Election campaign that she believes Australia should become a Republic at the end of the reign of Queen Elizabeth II.
 34% of those surveyed share this view, and wish that Queen Elizabeth II be the last monarch to rule over Australia.
 At the extremes of the poll, 29% of people surveyed thought Australia should become a Republic as quickly as possible, while 31% thought Australia should never become a Republic.
 The Olympic gold medallist was due to swim the 100 and 200 metres freestyle and three relays at the Commonwealth Games, but because of his complaints, his physical condition was put in doubt.
 He was unable to take the necessary medication to overcome his pain, as these were banned from within the Games.
 Curtis Cooper, mathematician and professor of computer science at the University of Central Missouri, discovered the largest prime number known to date on January 25.
 Several people verified the discovery using different materials and software at the beginning of February, and it was announced Tuesday.
 Comets may have been a source of water for the earth, as well as organic matter that can form proteins and favor life.
 Scientists hope to understand how planets form, and more particularly how the earth formed, since comets have been entering into collision with it long ago.
 Cuomo, 53, began his term as governor earlier this year and signed a bill last month legalizing same-sex marriage.
 He called the rumors babble and political nonsense.
 He is thought to be running for the Presidency in 2016.
 According to the FAA, NextGen is a system that would allow planes to fly shorter distances and save millions of gallons of fuel each year, limiting carbon emissions.
 It relies on satellite technologies, and not on ground-based radar systems used previously, which allows air traffic controllers to locate planes with greater precision and provide pilots with more detailed information.
 The additional transport is inexistent and the surface trains will not stop at Wembley, and the park and ride facilities are not available on the ground.
 The fear of lack of transportation has engendered the possibility that the match could be played behind closed doors, without the teams' supporters.
 A study published Thursday in the journal Science detailed the genesis of a new bird species in the Galapagos Islands off Ecuador.
 Researchers from the University of Princeton in the United States and the University of Uppsala in Sweden indicated that the new species had evolved in only two generations, although this process was estimated to be much longer, following reproduction between an endemic Darwin's finch, Geospiza fortis, and the immigrant conirostris finch, Geospiza conirostris.
 Gold can be shaped in many ways. It can be rolled into tiny pieces,
 It can be drawn into fine filaments, which can be twisted and woven. It can be hammered or rolled into sheets.
 It can be made very thin, and stuck on another metal. It can be so thin that it has sometimes been used to decorate the pictures painted by hand in books called illuminated manuscripts.
 This is called the pH of a chemical. You can make an indicator using red cabbage juice.
 The juice of cabbage changes color depending on the acidity or basicity of the chemical.
 The pH level is indicated by the amount of hydrogen ions (the H in pH) present in the chemical tested.
 Hydrogen ions are protons that have been deprived of their electron (since hydrogen atoms are composed of a proton and an electron).
 Mix the two dry powders together, then, with clean and humid hands, press them into a ball.
 The moisture on your hands will react with the outer layers, which will induce a strange sensation and produce a sort of shell.
 The cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-daro had toilets equipped with a flushing system in almost every house, connected to a sophisticated sewage system.
 Descendants of the Minoan cities of Crete and Santorini in Greece have found remains of sewage systems in their houses.
 There were also toilets in ancient Egypt, Persia and China, in the Roman civilization, toilets were sometimes part of public baths where men and women would bathe together.
 When you call someone who is thousands of miles away, you use a satellite.
 The satellite receives the call in space and then sends it back to earth, almost instantly.
 The satellite was sent into space by a rocket, and scientists use telescopes in space because the earth's atmosphere distorts a portion of our light and our vision.
 It takes a giant rocket more than 30 metres high to put a satellite or telescope into space.
 The wheel changed the world in many ways. The greatest advantage it has brought us is that it has made transport much simpler and faster.
 This has brought us the train, the car and many other means of transportation.
 Below are cats of a more medium size which eat prey of a more medium size, ranging from rabbits to antelopes and other chevreuils.
 In addition, there are numerous small cats, including pet cats, that eat the many more numerous small prey, such as insects, rodents, lizards and birds.
 The secret of their success is the concept of niche, a special task assigned to each feline, preventing it from entering into competition with the others.
 Lions are the most sociable cats, living in large groups called prides.
 The packs are composed of one to three adult males, related, as well as thirty females and lion cubs.
 Women are generally very close to each other, their family being composed of a large number of sisters and daughters.
 Lions act like wolves or dogs, animals surprisingly similar to lions in their behaviour, and also very deadly to their prey.
 Athlete balanced, the tiger can climb, swim, jump great distances, and pull with five times the force of a powerful human.
 Tigers are part of the same family (genus Panthera) as lions, leopards and jaguars, the only four felines capable of roaring.
 The tiger's roar does not resemble the lion's ample roar, but rather a phrase of which the words would be cries and grumbles.
 Ocelots are fond of small animals, they catch monkeys, snakes, rats and birds if they can. Almost all the animals that the ocelot hunts are much smaller than it.
 According to scientists, ocelots track and find their prey by smelling their trail on the ground.
 They see very well in the dark thanks to their nocturnal vision, and move very stealthily, relying on their surroundings to hide them before they pounce on their prey.
 When a small group of living beings (a small population) is separated from the main population from which it originated, for example, if it moves over a mountain range or a river, or if it moves to a new Island so that it cannot easily return,
 This new environment has different resources and different competitors, so the new population will need new characteristics or adaptations to be a powerful competitor compared to what it needed before.
 The original population has not changed at all, they still need the same adaptations.
 Over time, as the new population adapts to its new environment, it begins to look less and less like the other population.
 Finally, after thousands or even millions of years, the two populations will appear so different that they can no longer be considered as belonging to the same species.
 We call this process speciation, which simply means the formation of new species.
 Plants produce oxygen that humans breathe, and they absorb the carbon dioxide that humans exhale.
 Plants produce their food using photosynthesis, and they also provide shade.
 It is likely that the notation was added simply as a label.
 The Mosasaur was the super predator of the time, it feared nothing, except other Mosasaurs.
 Its long jaws were lined with more than 70 razor-sharp teeth, plus a supplementary set of teeth in the palate, so that anything that crossed its path could not escape.
 We're not sure, but it's possible that he had a forked tongue, his diet included turtles, large fish, other mosasaurs, and it's possible that he was even cannibalistic.
 He also attacked anything that entered the water, even a giant dinosaur like a T. rex was no match for him.
 Although the Romans consumed food that we know, they ate certain strange or unusual dishes, including wild boar, peacocks, snails, and the loir, a sort of rodent.
 Another difference is that while the poor and the woman ate their food sitting on chairs, the rich men liked to organize banquets together where they rested on the side while they took their repast.
 Roman meals in the ancient world could not include these foods of American or Asian origin that were introduced to Europe centuries later.
 For example, they had no maize, nor tomatoes, nor potatoes, nor cacao, and no ancient Roman ever tasted turkey.
 Babylonians constructed for each of their gods a principal temple which was considered the home of the god.
 People brought sacrifices to the gods and priests tried to meet the needs of the gods through ceremonies and festivities.
 Each temple had an open courtyard, then an inner sanctuary to which only the priests could accede.
 Some pyramid towers, the ziggurats, were sometimes built as elements of a temple.
 The summit of the tower was a special sanctuary for the god.
 In the hot climate of the Middle East, the house was not so important.
 The major part of the Hebrew family life took place outdoors.
 Women cooked in the courtyard, shops were only open counters, and the houses were built of stone.
 As there were no great forests in the land of Canaan, wood was extremely expensive.
 Greenland has been sparsely populated. In the Scandinavian Sagas, it is told that Erik the Red was exiled from Iceland for murder,
 But regardless of its discovery, Eskimo tribes were already living there at the time.
 Although each country is Scandinavian, there are many differences between the peoples, Kings, customs, and history of Denmark, Sweden, Norway, and Iceland.
 If you've seen the movie National treasure, you might think that a treasure map was drawn on the back of the Declaration of Independence.
 However, this is not true. Although there is an inscription on the back of the document, it is not a treasure card.
 On the back of the Declaration of Independence, one could read the words, “Original Declaration of Independence dated July 4, 1776.” The text is at the bottom of the document, upside down.
 Although no one knows who actually wrote it, we know that at an early stage of its existence, the great parchment, which measures about 29 and three quarters by 24 inches, was rolled up.
 It is therefore probable that the notation was added simply as a label.
 The D-Day landings and the battles that followed liberated the north of France, but the south was still not free.
 It was governed by the French of Vichy, French who made peace with the Germans in 1940 and collaborated with the occupier instead of confronting them.
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies landed in the south of France, an invasion called Operation Dragoon.
 In just two weeks, the Americans and the Forces of the Free French had liberated the South of France and were heading towards Germany.
 A civilization is a singular culture shared by a large group of people who live and work in cooperation, a society.
 The term civilization is derived from the Latin word civilis, which means civil and which is akin to the Latin words civis, which means citizen, and civitas, which means great city or city-state and which also indicates, in some sort, the size of the society to which it refers.
 Cities are the precursors of nations. A civilizational culture implies the transmission of knowledge over several generations, a durable cultural imprint and a fair diffusion.
 Minority cultures often disappear without leaving any historical traces and are not recognized as true civilizations.
 During the Revolutionary War, the thirteen States first formed a weak central government—the Congress being its only component—under the Articles of Confederation.
 Congress had no power to impose taxes, and, as there was no national executive or judiciary, it relied on the States, often uncooperative, to enforce all its acts.
 He had no power to derogate from the laws on taxes or on duties between the States.
 The articles required the unanimous consent of all the States before they could be amended, and the States took the central government so lightly that their representatives were often absent.
 The Italian national football team is, with the German national team, the second most titled team in the world and it won the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Among the popular sports are football, basketball, volleyball, fencing, rugby, cycling, hockey, roller hockey and Formula 1.
 Winter sports are the most popular in the northern regions, with Italians participating in international games and Olympic events.
 Japan has nearly 7,000 islands, the largest being Honshu, which makes it the 7th largest Island in the world.
 Because of the group of Islands that compose it, Japan is often designated, from a geographic point of view, as an archipelago.
 The first information concerning Taiwan dates back to the fifteenth century, while European navigators passing by there mentioned it under the name of Ilha Formosa, or beautiful Island.
 In 1624, the Dutch East India company established a base in the southwest of Taiwan, introducing a transformation of indigenous practices of cereal production and employing Chinese workers to work in its rice and sugar plantations.
 In 1683, forces of the Qing dynasty (1644-1912) took control of the Western and Northern coastal areas of Taiwan and declared it a province of the Qing Empire in 1885.
 In 1895, after its defeat in the first Sino-Japanese war, the Qing government signed the Shimonoseki Treaty, by which it ceded sovereignty over Taiwan to Japan, which ruled the island until 1945.
 Machu Picchu is composed of three main structures, namely the Intihuatana, the temple of the sun and the room of the three windows.
 Almost all the buildings that border the complex have been rebuilt to offer tourists a better view of their original appearance.
 In 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu had been restored and this restoration continues to this day.
 For example, the most common photography format in the world is 35 mm, which was the most common film format at the end of the analogue era.
 It's still made today, but what matters is that its image format is inherited from the format of the Digital camera's sensor.
 The 35 mm format is, in fact, and this is quite disconcerting, 36 mm wide by 24 mm high.
 So, the ratio of this format, dividing by twelve to get the simplest of all ratios of integers,
 Many common formats (family of formats, for example) are equal to this aspect ratio or are close to it.
 The third rule, often turned into ridicule, is a simple directive that stimulates dynamism while offering protection to the image.
 It indicates that the most efficient place for the principal subject is at the intersection of the lines dividing the image into thirds vertically and horizontally.
 During this period of European history, the Catholic Church, which had become rich and powerful, was questioned.
 For more than a thousand years, the Christian religion has bound the European States together, despite the differences of language and customs.
 His omnipresent power touched everyone, from the King to the Roturier.
 One of the main Christian principles is that wealth is to be used to relieve suffering and poverty, and that the church's monetary funds are there specifically for this reason.
 The central authority of the church was in Rome for over 1000 years and this concentration of power and money led many people to question whether this doctrine was respected.
 Soon after the beginning of hostilities, Britain put in place a naval blockade against Germany.
 This strategy proved effective, cutting off vital military and civilian supplies, although this blockade violated generally accepted international law codified by several international agreements of the last two centuries.
 Britain mined international waters in order to prevent ships from venturing into entire maritime zones, thus posing a threat even to neutral ships.
 As this tactic only sparked a timid reaction, Germany expected a similar reaction to its unlimited submarine warfare.
 During the years of the twentieth century, most citizens and nations showed a penchant for pacifism and isolation.
 After seeing the horrors and atrocities of World War I, nations wanted to avoid such a situation from ever happening again.
 In 1884, Tesla settled in the United States of America to accept a job at the Edison company in New York.
 He arrived in the United States with four hundred dollars, a book of poetry, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor, his director in his previous job, to Thomas Edison.
 Ancient China had a unique way of showing the different eras, each stage of China or each family that was in power was a distinct dynasty.
 Between each dynasty, there was also an unstable age of divided provinces, the most well-known of which is the era of the Three Kingdoms, which lasted for 60 years between the Han dynasty and the Jin dynasty.
 During these periods, fierce struggles took place between many members of the nobility who were fighting for the throne.
 The three kingdoms were one of the bloodiest eras in Chinese history, with thousands of people dying in combat to sit on the throne of the great Palace of Xi'An.
 There are many social and political implications such as the use of the metric system, the shift from absolutism to Republicanism, nationalism, and the belief that the country belongs to the people and not to a single leader.
 Also, after the Revolution, the trades were opened to all male candidates, allowing the most ambitious and talented to succeed.
 It's the same for the Army, because the ranking of the armies is no longer based on class, but on caliber.
 The French Revolution also inspired many other repressed working-class people in other countries to start their own revolution.
 Muhammad was deeply interested in questions that went beyond the framework of this worldly life. He used to frequent a cave that became famous under the name of Hira' on the mountain of Noor for contemplation.
 The cave itself, which has survived to the present day, gives a very vivid picture of Muhammad's spiritual inclinations.
 Situated at the top of one of the mountains north of Mecca, the cave is totally isolated from the rest of the world.
 In reality, it's not easy at all to find, even though we know it exists. When we entered the cave, we were completely isolated.
 Above, one can contemplate nothing but the clear and magnificent sky and the numerous mountains surrounding it.
 The great pyramid of Giza is the only one of the seven wonders that still exists today.
 Built by the Egyptians in the third millennium BC, the great pyramid is one of many giant structures erected in honor of the Pharaohs who died.
 The plateau of Giza, or the Giza necropolis, in the Valley of the Kings in Egypt, is home to several pyramids, including the largest, the great pyramid, several smaller tombs, numerous temples, and the great Sphinx.
 The great pyramid was created to honor Pharaoh Khufu, and many smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built to honor his wives and members of his family.
 The symbol push resembles a V and the symbol pull resembles a staple or a square with the bottom side missing.
 The top means you have to start by the point and push the bow, and the bottom means you have to start by the frog (which is the end where your hand holds the bow) and pull the bow.
 A bow held up produces generally a softer sound, while a bow held down is louder and more assertive.
 Feel free to inscribe your own marks in pencil, but do not forget that printed bow marks are for a musical reason, and therefore generally need to be respected.
 On October 6, 1789, King Louis XVI, Queen Marie-Antoinette, their two young children (Marie-Thérèse, 11, and Louis-Charles, 4), and the King's sister, Madame Élisabeth, all terrified, are forced to return to Paris from Versailles by a crowd of vendors.
 In a carriage, they are driven back to Paris surrounded by a crowd of people who are shouting and crying out threats against the King and the Queen.
 The King and the Queen were obliged, because of the crowd, to have the windows of their carriages opened.
 At one point, a member of the crowd brandished the head of a Royal Guard killed at Versailles in front of the terrified queen.
 The war expenses of American imperialism in conquering the Philippines were paid by the Philippine people themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the American colonial regime to cover a large part of the expenses and interest on bonds issued in the name of the Philippine government by Wall Street banking establishments.
 Naturally, the superprofits issuing from the prolonged exploitation of the Philippine people could constitute the fundamental advantages of American imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, one must understand the context that led to the creation of the order.
 These events took place in the period generally considered as the High Middle Ages, a period of history in Europe running from the eleventh to the thirteenth century.
 The central Middle Ages were preceded by the High Middle Ages and followed by the Low Middle Ages, which conventionally ends around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a term that encompasses a wide range of ideas in practice, ranging from technological push or technological imperative to a strict sense in which the destiny of humanity is dictated by a subjacent logic related to scientific laws and their manifestation in technologies.
 Most interpretations of technological determinism agree on two general ideas: the technological development itself unfolds according to a process largely beyond cultural and political influences, and technology has an incidence on intrinsically conditioned rather than socially conditioned societies.
 For example, one could say that the automobile leads necessarily to the development of roads.
 However, a national road network is not economically viable for a handful of cars, so new methods of production are being developed to reduce the cost of owning a car.
 The massive possession of cars also leads to a greater incidence of accidents on the roads, which leads to the invention of new techniques in the field of health care to treat the injuries.
 Romanticism presented an important element of cultural determinism, drawn from writers such as Goethe, Fichte and Schlegel.
 According to the theories of Romanticism, geography would have shaped individuals and, with time, customs and a culture related to this geography would appear, in harmony with the places occupied by society, would be preferable to laws imposed arbitrarily.
 In the same way that Paris is known as the capital of the world's contemporary fashion, Constantinople was considered as the capital of feudal Europe.
 Its reputation as an epicenter of luxury began around the year 400, and lasted until about 1100.
 Its status declined in the twelfth century, principally because the Crusaders returned laden with presents such as silk and spices, with which the Byzantine markets could hardly compete.
 It was at this time that the title of capital of fashion was transferred from Constantinople to Paris.
 The Gothic style reached its apogee between the tenth to eleventh century and the fourteenth century.
 At first, the robe was heavily influenced by the Byzantine culture to the East.
 However, because of the slowness of communication, Western modes could accuse a delay of 25 to 30 years.
 In the late Middle Ages, Western Europe began to develop its own style. One of the greatest advances of the time, following the Crusades, was the use of buttons for fastening clothing.
 Subsistence agriculture is a form of agriculture practiced to produce food sufficient to meet only the needs of the farmer and his family.
 Subsistence agriculture is a simple system, often biological, using seed conserved originally from the ecoregion, combined with crop rotation or other relatively simple techniques to maximize yield.
 Historically, most farmers practiced subsistence agriculture and this is still the case in many developing countries.
 Subcultures bring together individuals who feel neglected by societal norms and share the same ideas, which allows them to develop a sense of identity.
 Subcultures can be distinguished by age, ethnicity, class, location and or sex of the members.
 The criteria that determine a subculture as distinct can be linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, geographic, or a combination of factors.
 Members of a subculture often signal their membership by distinctive and symbolic use of style, which encompasses fashions, manners, and slang.
 One of the most common methods used to illustrate the importance of socialization is to draw inspiration from the few unfortunate cases of children who, through neglect, misfortune or voluntary abuse, have not been socialized by adults during their childhood.
 These children are considered as ferocious or wild. Some wild children have been imprisoned by persons, generally their own parents, in some cases the abandonment of this child was due to the parents' rejection of a serious intellectual or physical disability of the child.
 Wild children may have suffered severe abuse or trauma before being abandoned or running away.
 Others would have been raised by animals, some would have lived alone in the wild.
 When they are fully raised by Non-Human species, the children display behaviors (within the limits of their physical dispositions) almost identical to those of the animals that raised them, such as fear or indifference toward humans.
 While project pedagogy should make learning easier and more interesting, support goes further.
 Support is not a method of learning but rather a means of helping learners who are discovering new teaching such as the use of a new program or the beginning of a new project.
 Supports can be both virtual and real, otherwise known as a professor, but the little man trombone from Microsoft office is one too.
 Virtual scaffolding is integrated into the software and is designed to interrogate, guide and explain procedures that might have been too difficult for the student to manage alone.
 Children are placed in foster families for a wide range of reasons, from neglect to abuse, including extortion.
 No child should ever have to grow up in an environment that is not stimulating, nurturing and educational, but that is the case.
 We perceive the family placement system as a zone of security for these children.
 Our foster care system is supposed to provide safe homes, loving caregivers, stable education and reliable health care.
 Placement in foster care is supposed to provide all the necessities that were lacking in the home from which they were previously removed.
 Internet allies elements of mass communication and interpersonal communication.
 The distinctive characteristics of the Internet lead to additional dimensions in terms of approach to uses and gratifications.
 For example, learning and socialization are considered as major factors favoring the use of Internet (James et al., 1995).
 The personal involvement and the continued relationships were also identified as new motivational aspects by Eighmey and McCord (1998) when they studied public reactions to Internet sites.
 The use of Video-Recording has led to great discoveries in the interpretation of Micro-Expressions, that is, facial expressions lasting only a few Milliseconds.
 It's claimed that you can detect if a person is lying by correctly interpreting micro-expressions.
 Oliver Sacks, in his article The President's Speech, indicated how people with brain lesions are nevertheless able to evaluate sincerity with precision.
 He suggests that such capacities for interpreting human behavior may be found in animals such as domestic dogs.
 Research in the twentieth century has shown that there are two reservoirs of genetic variation: hidden and expressed.
 The mutation adds a new genetic variation, and selection removes it from the reserve of expressed variations.
 Segregation and recombine make variations alternate between the two basins at each generation.
 In the savannah, it is difficult for a primate with a digestive system similar to that of humans to satisfy its needs in amino acids from the available vegetable resources.
 In addition, an absence of reaction has grave consequences: growth disturbances, malnutrition and, in the end, death.
 The most easily accessible vegetable resources would be the proteins contained in leaves and legumes, but these are difficult to digest for primates like us, unless they are cooked.
 In contrast, food of animal origin (ants, termites, eggs) is easy to digest while providing a great deal of protein containing all the vital amino acids.
 All things considered, we should not be surprised if our own ancestors resolved their own protein problem in much the same way as the Savannah chimpanzees do today.
 The interruption of sleep is the process that consists of intentionally waking during your sleep period and then falling back to sleep shortly afterward (10 to 60 minutes).
 This can be done easily by using a relatively silent alarm clock, so that you can wake up without fully waking up.
 If you find yourself resetting the clock during your sleep, it can be placed on the other side of the room, forcing you out of bed to turn it off.
 Other possibilities based on the biorythme include drinking a lot of fluids before going to sleep, particularly water or tea, reputed to be diuretic,
 The degree of inner peace of a person opposes the degree of tension in his body and his mind.
 The more tension is low, the more vital force present is positive. Every person has the possibility to find absolute peace and contentment.
 Everyone can attain enlightenment. The only thing that stands in the way of this is our own tension and negativity.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of Buddha, but has been enriched by the Mahayana path of love and many techniques of Indian yoga.
 In principle, Tibetan Buddhism is very simple, it consists of Kundalini Yoga, meditation and the way of universal love.
 With Kundalini Yoga, the Kundalini energy (energy of enlightenment) is awakened through yoga postures, breathing exercises, Mantras and visualizations.
 The center of Tibetan meditation is the yoga of the deity, in which visualization of various deities is used to cleanse the energy channels, activate the chakras, and create awareness.
 Germany was a common enemy during World War II, which led to cooperation between the USSR and the United States. At the end of the war, the profound conflicts between their different systems, methods and cultures ended the entente between these two countries.
 Two years after the end of the war, the former allies became enemies and the cold war began.
 It was to last for the next 40 years and would see real affronts, through armies of substitution, on battlefields as well in Africa as in Asia, in Afghanistan, in Cuba and in many other places.
 On September 17, 1939, the Polish defense was already broken, and the only hope was to retreat and reorganize along the Romanian head of the bridge.
 But these plans became obsolete almost overnight when more than 800,000 Soviet Red Army soldiers arrived and created the Bi-Belarusian and Ukrainian front after invading the Eastern regions of Poland, violating the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact, as well as other bilateral and multilateral treaties.
 The use of ships for the transport of goods is by far the most efficient way to move large quantities of people and goods across the oceans.
 The work of the marines has traditionally been to ensure that your country maintains the ability to move your people and your goods, while interfering with your enemy's ability to move their people and their goods.
 One of the most remarkable examples of this situation was the North Atlantic campaign during World War II, in which the Americans were trying to get soldiers and equipment across the Atlantic ocean to help Britain.
 At the same time, the German Navy, using principally U-Boats, tried to stop this traffic.
 If the Allies had failed, Germany probably could have conquered Britain as it had done for the rest of Europe.
 It seems that goats were first domesticated about 10,000 years ago in the Zagros mountains of Iran.
 Cultures and ancient tribes began to keep them close to them for easy access to milk, hair, meat and skins.
 Domestic goats were generally kept in herds that wandered over hills or other spaces of pasture, often tended by shepherds who were mostly children or adolescents, similar to the more familiar term of shepherds.
 Wagonways were built in England as early as the sixteenth century.
 Although the wagonways were simply constituted of parallel boards of wood, they permitted the horses that drew them to attain greater speeds and to draw charges more important than on the slightly more accidented roads of the day.
 Croisillons were introduced fairly early to maintain the tracks in place, however, it was soon realised that the tracks would be more effective if they were fitted with a band of iron on the top.
 This became a common practice, but the iron caused more wear on the wooden wheels of the wagons.
 Finally, wooden wheels were replaced by iron wheels. In 1767, the first iron rails made their appearance.
 The first means of locomotion was walking: humans began to walk upright two million years ago with the arrival of Homo Erectus, the upright man.
 Their predecessors, the Australopithecines, did not walk upright as usual.
 Bipedal specializations are found in the fossils of Australopithecus from 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago, although Sahelanthropus may have walked on two legs as early as seven million years ago.
 We can start by living in better harmony with the environment, we can join the environmental movement, and we can even militate in order to mitigate future suffering.
 In many cases, it is a symptomatic treatment, however, if we do not want only a temporary solution, we must find the root of the problems and disable them.
 It is clear that the world has changed a lot thanks to the scientific and technological progress made by human beings, and that the problems have become more important because of the surplus population and the extravagant lifestyle of humanity.
 After its adoption by the Congress on July 4, a manuscript draft signed by the President of the Congress, John Hancock, and the Secretary, Charles Thomson, was then sent to a few streets away, to the printing shop of John Dunlap.
 During the night, between 150 and 200 copies were made, today known as the Dunlap Broadsides.
 The first public reading of the document was made by John Nixon in the courtyard of Independence Hall on July 8.
 One of them was sent to George Washington on July 6, which he had read to his troops in New York on July 9. A copy reached London on August 10.
 The 25 Dunlap sheets, of which we still know the existence, are the most ancient copies of the document.
 Many paleontologists today think that a group of dinosaurs survived and are still alive today.
 Few people consider them dinosaurs, given that they have wings and can fly.
 But there are many things about birds that still resemble a dinosaur.
 They have legs covered with scales and equipped with claws, they lay eggs and walk on their two hind legs like T-Rex.
 Practically all computers used today are based on the manipulation of information that is coded in the form of Binary numbers.
 Binary numbers can only have one of two values: 0 or 1. These numbers are called Binary, or bits for short.
 Internal poisoning may not be visible immediately, symptoms such as vomiting are generally enough to rule out immediate diagnosis.
 The best indicator of internal poisoning is probably the presence of an open container of toxic household chemicals or drugs.
 Consult the label for specific first aid instructions for this poison.
 The term insect is used by entomologists in a formal sense for this group of insects.
 This term derives from an ancient familiarity with bed bugs, which are insects very adapted to parasitize humans.
 Les réduves, like bedbugs, are nidicolous, that is, adapted to live in the nest or the habitat of their host.
 In the United States, there are about 400,000 known cases of multiple sclerosis, making it the leading neurological disease in young and middle-aged adults.
 Sclerosis is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which is composed of the brain, spinal cord and optic nerve.
 Research has shown that women are two times more likely to have multiple sclerosis than men.
 A couple may very well estimate that it is not in their interest, nor in the interest of the child, to take care of a baby.
 These couples may choose to make an adoption plan for their baby.
 In the case of adoption, the biological parents end their parental rights so that another couple can raise the child.
 The main objective of science is to understand how the world works through the scientific method, which guides most scientific research.
 This, however, is not the only experiment, an experiment is a test that serves to eliminate one or more of the possible hypotheses, to ask questions and to make observations, but that also orients scientific research.
 Naturalists and philosophers concentrated on the ancient texts, and in particular on the Bible in Latin.
 Aristotle's opinions on all scientific questions, including psychology, have been accepted.
 With the decline of knowledge of Greek, the West found itself cut off from its Greek philosophical and scientific roots.
 Many rhythms observed in physiology and behaviour often depend in large part on the presence of endogenous cycles and their production by biological clocks.
 Periodic rhythms, which do not simply constitute responses to periodic external stimuli, have been documented for most living beings, including bacteria, fungi, plants and animals.
 Biological clocks are self-sustaining oscillators that will continue a cycle of functioning for a certain period, even in the absence of external stimulation.
 The Hershey and Chase experiment was one of the main indications that DNA was a genetic material.
 Hershey and Chase used phages, or viruses, to implant their own DNA into a bacterium.
 They have done two experiments to mark either the DNA of the phage with radioactive phosphorus, or the protein of the phage with radioactive sulphur.
 Mutations can have many different effects depending on the type of mutation, the importance of the part of the genetic material affected and whether the affected cells are germ cells.
 Only mutations of germ cells can be transmitted to children, while other mutations can cause the death of cells or cancer.
 Ecotourism interests people who wish to visit natural areas in order to enjoy the scenery, particularly wildlife.
 Hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching, park visiting and studying information about the ecosystem are examples of on-site activities.
 We can, for example, go and see, photograph and discover the orangutans of Borneo.
 Every morning, people leave the small towns in the countryside in their cars to go to their place of work and cross other people who are going to work in the countryside they have just left.
 In this dynamic transportation system, everyone is in some way reliant on a system based on private cars and support.
 Science now shows that this economy, massively based on carbon, has dislodged the biosphere from its state of stability that has supported human evolution for two million years.
 Everyone is part of the society and uses the transport systems. Quasi everyone complains about the transport systems.
 In developed countries, it is rare to hear so many complaints about the quality of water or the collapse of bridges.
 Why do transport systems generate such complaints, why do they break down daily? Are transport engineers simply incompetent, or is something more fundamental going on?
 The flow of traffic is the study of the movements of drivers and private vehicles between two points, and the interactions they exert between them.
 Unfortunately, it is difficult to study the flow of traffic because the behavior of drivers cannot be predicted with one hundred percent certainty.
 Fortunately, drivers tend to act within a reasonably coherent range, so traffic flows tend to have a reasonable coherence and can be represented mathematically in a reasonably approximate way.
 To better represent the traffic flow, relationships have been established between the three main characteristics: (1) the throughput, (2) the density and (3) the speed.
 These relationships help with planning, design, and operation of roadway facilities.
 Insects were the first animals to fly, their ability to fly allowing them to escape their enemies more easily and to find food and mates more efficiently.
 Most insects have the advantage of being able to fold their wings along the body.
 This gives them a greater number of small places to hide from predators.
 Today, the only insects that cannot fold their wings are the dragon flies and the Ephemeroptera.
 A few thousand years ago, a man named Aristarchus claimed that the solar system moved around the sun.
 Some thought he was right, but many believed the opposite: that the solar system was moving around the earth, including the sun (and even other stars).
 This seems reasonable, because the earth doesn't seem to be moving, does it?
 The Amazon River is the second longest and the largest River on earth, carrying more than eight times the volume of water of the second largest River.
 The Amazon is also the largest River in the planet, reaching sometimes 10 km wide.
 Less than 20% of the water that flows from the rivers of the planet into the oceans comes from the Amazon.
 The main branch of the Amazon River is 6,387 kilometers long. It collects water from thousands of small rivers.
 Although pyramids in stone were built until the end of the Old Kingdom, the pyramids of Giza were never surpassed in size or technical excellence.
 The ancient Egyptians of the New Kingdom were amazed at the monuments of their predecessors, who were then more than a thousand years old.
 The Vatican is the smallest independent country in the world, with about 800 inhabitants.
 The Vatican City State writes its legislation and official communications in Italian.
 Italian is also the everyday language used by most people who work in the state, while Latin is often used in religious ceremonies.
 The citizens of the Vatican City are all Catholics.
 Since antiquity, people are familiar with basic chemical elements like gold, silver and copper, because they occur in nature in a raw form and are fairly simple to mine using primitive tools.
 Aristotle, a philosopher, theorized that everything is made up of a mixture of one or more of the four elements, earth, water, air, and fire.
 It was rather the four states of matter (in the same order) solid, liquid, gaseous and plasma, although he also emitted the theory that these last transform into new substances to form what we see.
 Alloys are essentially a mixture of two or more metals. Remember, the periodic table contains many elements.
 Elements like calcium and potassium are considered metals, and of course there are metals like silver and gold.
 Alloys are also found that comprise a small amount of non-metallic elements, such as carbon.
 Everything in the universe is made of matter. All matter is made of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so incredibly small that billions of them could fit into the period at the end of this sentence.
 So the pencil was a good friend to many people when it came out.
 Unfortunately, the appearance of new writing modes has relegated the pen to a more confidential and more rare status.
 People write messages on computer screens nowadays, without ever having to approach a crayon.
 One can only wonder what the keyboard will become when the next novelty arrives.
 The fission bomb works on the principle of assembling a nucleus of a myriad of protons and neutrons.
 It's a bit like if you were to make a cart climb a hill, by dividing the nucleus again, and then releasing a bit of that energy.
 Some atoms have an unstable nucleus, so they tend to break apart with little or no pressure.
 The surface of the moon is made of stones and dust, its outer layer is called the crust.
 The thickness of the crust is about 70 km on the visible face and 100 km on the hidden face.
 It is finer at the level of the seas and thicker under the continents.
 There may be more Maria on the near side because the crust is thinner, it was easier for the lava to come up to the surface.
 Theories of content are centered on the search for what makes people feel good or what they are attracted to.
 These theories suggest that people have certain needs and or desires that have been internalized as they matured towards adulthood.
 These theories examine what drives certain people to want the things they do and what, in their environment, drives them to do or not do certain things.
 Two theories of content are Maslow's hierarchy of needs and Herzberg's two-factor theory.
 In many cases, two behaviors can emerge when a manager becomes the boss of former colleagues, one of the extremities of the spectrum being to try to remain the good cop.
 This type of manager has a hard time making unpopular decisions, taking disciplinary action, doing evaluations, giving responsibilities, and holding others accountable.
 At the other end of the spectrum, one transforms into an unrecognisable individual who feels that he or she must change everything that the group has created up to that point and do things in his or her own way.
 After all, the chief is responsible in the last resort for the success and failure of the team.
 This behavior often leads to dissension between leaders and the rest of the team.
 Virtual teams are subject to the same standards of excellence as conventional teams, but there are subtle differences.
 Members of a virtual team often function as the point of contact for their immediate physical group.
 They often have more autonomy than traditional team members because their teams can meet in different time zones, which may not be understood by their local management.
 The presence of a real invisible team (Larson and LaFasto, 1989, p109) is also a unique element of a virtual team.
 The invisible team is the management team to which each member renders his or her accounts. It establishes the standards for each of them.
 Why would an organization want to impose the fastidious process of creating a learning structure? One of the goals linked to the implementation of organizational learning concepts is innovation.
 When all available resources are used efficiently in the functional services of an organization, creativity and ingenuity can fully express themselves.
 The composition of these crystals matches those found in the urine of affected pets when compared by infrared spectroscopy (FTIR).
 Before an organization can be innovative, its leadership must create a culture of innovation, shared knowledge and its own culture of learning.
 Angel (2006) presents the Continuum approach as a method used to help organizations achieve better results.
 Neurobiological data provide material evidence for a theoretical approach to the study of cognition, and therefore allow us to reduce the field of research and make it much more precise.
 The correlation between brain pathology and behaviour supports scientists in their research.
 We've known for a long time that different types of damage, lesions, tumors and brain trauma affect behavior and cause changes in certain mental functions.
 The rise of new technologies allows us to see and study brain structures and processes never seen before.
 This gives us a lot of information and material to construct simulation models that help us to understand the processes in our mind.
 Although artificial intelligence is often heavily connoted science-fiction, it represents a very important part of computer science that studies the behavior, learning and intelligent adaptation of a machine.
 Artificial intelligence research aims to automate tasks requiring intelligent approaches.
 Among the examples are control, planning and programming, the ability to respond to client diagnostics and questions, as well as recognition of writing, voice and face.
 These practices led to distinct disciplines, focused on providing solutions to the problems of everyday life.
 The IA system is now often used in the fields of economics, medicine, engineering, and the military, as it has been put in place in several domestic computer and video games software.
 Excursions are an integral part of any school class. Often, a teacher would like to take his or her students to places where a bus trip is not feasible.
 The solution is brought by technology in the form of virtual field trips, where students can watch museum objects, visit an Aquarium, or admire a beautiful work of art all while sitting with their class.
 Participating in practically any excursion is also an excellent way to reflect on a trip and share your experiences with future generations.
 For example, students at Bennet high school in North Carolina design a Website each year about their visit to the state capital, and each year the Website is updated, but the older versions are kept Online to serve as an album.
 Blogs can also help students improve their writing skills, even though students often try the Blogging experience with neglected grammar and spelling, the fact of having an audience generally makes the situation evolve.
 As students are often the most critical public, the author of the Blog begins to strive to improve his writing to avoid criticism.
 Blogging also forces students to better know the world around them. The need to generate interest in the public encourages students to be intelligent and interesting.
 Blogs are a tool that stimulate collaboration and encourage students to extend their learning well beyond the traditional school day.
 When used well, Blogs can help students strengthen their analysis and critical thinking skills by reacting actively to Online content, they can confront their views with others and expose their own points of view on specific topics.
 Ottawa is the charming bilingual capital of Canada and has a great number of art galleries and museums that showcase the past and present of Canada.
 You'll find more to the south the Niagara falls and to the north, the Muskoka region and its surroundings which possess a natural beauty untouched.
 All these measures, and many others, make Ontario what foreigners consider to be the quintessence of Canada.
 Large areas further north are sparsely populated and some are almost uninhabited in a wild state.
 For a comparison of the population that surprises more than one, there are more African-Americans living in the United States than there are Canadian citizens.
 The Islands of East Africa are situated in the Indian ocean, off the East African coast.
 Madagascar is by far the largest, and even a continent unto itself, in terms of fauna.
 Most of the smaller Islands are independent nations, or associated with France, and are known for being luxury resorts.
 Arabs also brought the practice of Islam to the Comoros and Mayotte.
 European influence and colonialism began in the fifteenth century, when the Portuguese explorer Vasco de Gama discovered the route to India.
 To the north, the region is delimited by the Sahel, and to the south and west by the Atlantic ocean.
 To women: It is recommended to any woman who travels to say that she is married, regardless of her civil status.
 It is also advisable to wear a wedding ring, which should not appear too precious.
 Women must realise that certain cultural differences can lead to behaviour that they consider harassment, such as being followed, grabbed by the arm, etc.
 Be firm in the refusal of advances, and do not be afraid to stand your ground (cultural differences or not, it does not mean that it is acceptable!)
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the tenth century BC, and was used by the Phoenicians, Romans and Merinides as a strategic port called Anfa.
 The Portuguese, who after having destroyed it, rebuilt it and baptized it Casa Branca, finally abandoned it in 1755 after an earthquake.
 The Moroccan Sultan rebuilt the city under the name of Daru l-Badya, and it was renamed Casablanca by Spanish traders who established trading posts there.
 Casablanca is one of the least interesting places in all of Morocco to shop.
 Around the old Medina, one can easily find places where to buy traditional Moroccan products, like tagines, pottery, leather goods, narguilés and all sorts of souvenirs, but that's all for tourists.
 Goma is a tourist city located in the extreme East of the Democratic Republic of Congo, near Rwanda.
 In 2002, Goma was destroyed by lava from the Nyiragongo volcano, which buried most of the city's streets, in particular the downtown.
 Although Goma is reasonably safe, any visit outside of Goma must be researched to understand the state of fighting that persists in the province of North Kivu.
 The city is also the starting point for ascension of Nyiragongo volcano as well as for mountain gorilla treks among the least expensive in Africa.
 You can use boda-boda (motorbike taxi) to get around in Goma. The normal price (local) is about 500 Congolese francs for a short ride.
 Combined with its relative inaccessibility, Tombouctou has become a metaphor for distant, exotic lands.
 Today, Timbuktu is a poor city, though its reputation makes it a tourist attraction, and it has an airport.
 In 1990, it was added to the list of World Heritage in Danger, due to the threat of desert sands.
 It was one of the main stops on Henry Louis Gates's PBS show, Wonders of the African World.
 The city contrasts strongly with the rest of the country, as it possesses a style more Arab than African.
 Kruger National Park is located in the northeast of South Africa and borders Mozambique to the east, Zimbabwe to the north and the Crocodile River to the south.
 The total surface of the park is 19,500 km², divided into 14 ecozones, each with a specific fauna.
 It is one of the most well-known amusement parks in South Africa and considered the flagship of South African National Parks.
 As with all South African national parks, there are daily entrance and conservation fees for the park.
 It may be advantageous to purchase a Wild Card that gives access to certain South African parks, as well as to all South African National parks.
 Hong Kong Island gives its name to the territory of Hong Kong and represents the main center of interest for many tourists.
 The row of buildings that draws the horizon of Hong Kong has been compared to a scintillating bar graph, which reflects in the waters of Victoria Harbour.
 To admire Hong Kong's most beautiful panoramas, leave the island and head to the Kowloon waterfront, located across the harbor.
 The great majority of Hong Kong's urban development is concentrated on the land reclamation of the northern shore.
 This is the place that the British colonists invested, so it seems to me a good place to start if you're looking for evidence of the colonial past of this region.
 The Sundarbans are the world's largest coastal mangrove belt, stretching 80 kilometers from the coast to the Bangladeshi and Indian hinterland.
 Sundarbans have been declared a UNESCO world heritage site. The part of the forest situated on the Indian territory is called Sundarbans National Park.
 The forests, however, are not composed solely of Mangrove swamps: they also contain some of the last remnants of the majestic jungles that once covered the Ganges plain.
 The Sundarbans cover an area of 3,850 km², of which about one third is covered with water.
 Sundarbans is a nature reserve since 1966, you can find there about 400 Royal Bengal Tigers and 30,000 spotted deer.
 Buses depart from the interdistrict bus station (located on the other side) throughout the day, but most, especially those serving the East and Jakar/Bumthang, depart between 6:30 and 7:30 in the morning.
 The inter-district buses are often full, so it is advised to buy a ticket a few days in advance.
 Most districts are served by small Japanese cabotage, which are comfortable and robust.
 The taxis collective are a fast and comfortable way to get to places near, such as Paro (150 Nu) and Punakha (200 Nu).
 The Oyapock bridge is a Hauban bridge, it spans the Oyapock River to link the cities of Oiapoque, Brazil, and Saint-Georges-de-l'Oyapock, in French Guiana.
 The two towers are 83 metres high, 378 metres long and have two lanes of 3.50 metres wide.
 The vertical clearance under the bridge is 15 metres. The structure was completed in August 2011, but it was not opened to traffic until March 2017.
 The bridge should be fully operational in September 2017, when Brazilian customs posts are expected to be completed.
 The Guaraní were the largest indigenous group living in what is now eastern Paraguay, living as semi-nomadic hunters and also practicing subsistence agriculture.
 Other indigenous tribes that peopled the Chaco, such as the Guaycurú or Payaguá, survived mainly thanks to fishing, hunting, or gathering.
 In the sixteenth century, Paraguay, once called the giant province of the Indies, was born of the encounter between Spanish conquerors and indigenous populations.
 The Spanish inaugurated the period of colonization, which lasted three centuries.
 Since the foundation of Asuncion in 1537, Paraguay has managed to preserve a large part of its indigenous character and identity.
 Argentina is known for having one of the best teams and among the best players of polo in the world.
 The largest tournament of the year takes place in December on the polo grounds of Las Cañitas.
 Tournaments and matches of lesser envergure are sometimes organized here at other times of the year.
 For information on tournaments and where to buy tickets for polo matches, consult the Asociacion Argentina de Polo.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Islands pound, which is equivalent to one pound sterling.
 Money can be exchanged at the only bank in the Islands, located in Stanley, opposite the FIC West store.
 Sterling is a commonly accepted currency throughout the Islands, while at Stanley, credit cards and U.S. dollars are also often accepted.
 On the neighbouring Islands, credit cards are probably not accepted, even though British and American currencies may be. Talk to the owners in advance to agree on a method of payment.
 It is almost impossible to exchange money from the Malvinas outside the Islands, so change it before you leave the Islands.
 Montevideo, being situated south of the equator, winter in the northern hemisphere corresponds to summer there, and vice versa.
 Montevideo is located in the subtropical zone and summer temperatures exceeding 30°C are common.
 Winter can be deceptively cold: temperatures rarely drop below zero, but the wind and humidity combine to give the impression that it is colder than the thermometer says.
 There are no real seasons of wet and dry,
 Although many animals in the park are used to seeing humans, it is nevertheless wild species, so please do not feed or disturb them.
 According to the park authorities, you need to stay at least 100 metres away from bears and wolves and 25 metres away from all other wild animals.
 As docile as they may appear, the bison, elk, moose, bear and almost all the great animals can attack.
 Every year, dozens of visitors are injured because they have not kept a sufficient distance. These animals are large, wild and potentially dangerous, so give them space.
 Also, know that odors attract bears and other wild animals, so avoid transporting or cooking odorant foods and keep the camp clean.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa. The city is located on the island of Upolu and has a little less than 40,000 inhabitants.
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and has been the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The port was the site of a notorious naval standoff in 1889 when seven ships from Germany, the United States and Britain refused to leave the port.
 All the ships were sunk, except for a British cruiser, and nearly 200 Americans and Germans lost their lives.
 The Supreme Chief Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III was assassinated during a peaceful rally in the city during the Mau movement.
 There are many beaches, as Auckland is on two harbours, the most popular being in three zones.
 The beaches of the North Shore (in the North Harbour district) are on the Pacific Ocean and stretch from Long Bay to the north to Devonport to the south.
 Almost all beaches are sandy and allow for safe swimming, and most are shaded by Pohutukawa.
 The beaches of Tamaki Drive are on the Waitemata harbour, in the chic suburbs of Mission Bay and St Heliers in the centre of Auckland.
 These beaches, sometimes very frequented by families, have many shops along the coastline, and bathing is safe.
 The main local beer is the Number One, a fairly ordinary but tasty and refreshing beer. There is also another local beer, the Manta.
 There are many French wines to taste, but New Zealand and Australian wines may travel better.
 You can drink the local tap water without danger, but you can easily find bottled water if you have concerns about it.
 For Australians, the idea of a cafe crme is foreign a short black is an espresso, a cappuccino is filled with cream and tea is served without milk.
 Hot chocolate is in line with Belgian standards. Fruit juices are expensive but excellent.
 Many trips to the reef are made throughout the year, and injuries due to one of these causes on the reef are rare.
 Nevertheless, follow the advice of the authorities, obey all signs, and pay particular attention to safety warnings.
 From October to April, north of 1770, the box jellyfish arrive near beaches and estuaries of rivers. They can also sometimes be seen outside of this period.
 Sharks exist, but they rarely attack humans, most of them are afraid of humans and would stay away.
 Saltwater crocodiles do not live actively in the ocean, their main habitat is found in the estuaries of rivers north of Rockhampton.
 Reserving in advance gives the traveler peace of mind knowing that he or she will have a place to sleep once arrived at their destination.
 Travel agencies often have agreements with specific hotels, but you can also book through travel agencies other types of accommodation, such as camping grounds.
 Travel agencies generally offer packages that include breakfast, transportation to and from the airport, or even packages that include the flight and the accommodation.
 They can also hold the reservation for you if you need time to think about the offer or to get other documents you need for your destination, for example, a visa.
 Any modification or request must however be addressed to the travel agency first and not directly to the hotel.
 At some music festivals, the vast majority of participants decide to camp on site, and most consider this to be an integral part of the experience.
 If you want to participate in the musical event, you'll need to arrive early to find a well-placed camping spot.
 Remember, even though music shows are over on the main stages, other music shows may continue late into the night at other festival sites.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with young children.
 If you cross the Baltic in winter, check the location of the cabin, as the crossing of the ice can cause unbearable noises at the most exposed cabins.
 Saint Petersburg cruises include time spent in the city. Cruise passengers are exempt from the visa requirement (see conditions).
 Casinos generally make many efforts to maximize the time and money spent by customers, and rarely have windows or clocks, and exits can be hard to spot.
 They generally offer special deals on food, drinks and entertainment to keep the guests happy and to keep them on the premises.
 On some sites, it's the locals who offer free alcoholic beverages, Nevertheless, drunkenness impairs judgment, and all good players know that it's crucial to stay sober.
 Anyone travelling by car to high latitudes or crossing mountain passes should envisage the possibility of snow, ice or glacial temperatures.
 On icy and snowy roads, friction is low and you can't drive as if you were on the asphalt.
 During blizzards, it can snow enough in a very short time to block you.
 Visibility can also be limited by snow or powdery or condensation on the windows of vehicles.
 On the other hand, the presence of ice and snow is normal in many countries, and traffic is practically uninterrupted all year round.
 Safaris are perhaps the greatest tourist attraction in Africa and the most memorable moment for many visitors.
 In common language, the term safari denotes a trip to Africa, particularly to the Savannah, to witness the spectacle of wild animals in their natural habitat.
 Some animals, such as elephants and giraffes, tend to approach cars closely and standard equipment permits them to be well observed.
 Lions, cheetahs and leopards are sometimes shy and you will see them better with binoculars.
 A safari on foot (also called a walk in the bush, a footing or a brousse walk) consists of hiking, either for a few hours or for several days.
 The Paralympics will be held from August 24 to September 5, 2021, with some events held in other locations throughout Japan.
 Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted two summer Olympic games, after hosting the games in 1964.
 If you have booked your flights and your accommodation in 2020 before the announcement of the postponement, you may find yourself in a difficult situation.
 The policies vary, but as of late March, most coronavirus-based cancellation policies do not extend through July 2020, the date at which the Olympics were supposed to take place.
 On-site tickets are expected to cost between 2,500 and 130,000 yen, with typical tickets costing around 7,000 yen.
 In passing wet clothes, one can dry them more easily. Many hotels have an iron and ironing board that can be lent, even if there is not one in the rooms.
 If you don't have an iron or if you don't want to wear ironed socks, you can try using a hair dryer, if you find one.
 Avoid letting the fabric overheat, which can cause it to shrink or in extreme cases, burn.
 There are different methods of water purification, some of which are more effective against specific threats.
 In some localities, it is sufficient to boil the water for one minute, in others, it is necessary to boil it for several minutes.
 The efficiency of filters varies, and if you have a concern, you should consider buying your water in a sealed bottle from a reputable company.
 Travellers may encounter pests that they do not know in their region of origin.
 Parasites can contaminate food, cause irritation or, in the most serious cases, cause allergic reactions, spread venom or transmit infections.
 Infectious diseases themselves, or dangerous animals that can injure or kill people by force, are generally not considered parasites.
 In some localities, the tax-free shops present an opportunity to buy goods exempt from taxes and duties.
 Travellers to countries where taxes are high can sometimes make considerable savings, in particular on products like alcoholic drinks or tobacco.
 The section between Point Marion and Fairmont presents the most difficult driving conditions on the Buffalo-Pittsburgh highway, passing frequently through isolated terrain of the back country.
 If you're not used to driving on country roads, keep an open mind: steep grades, narrow roads, and tight curves predominate.
 The speed limits posted are significantly lower than in the previous and following sections, generally from 35 to 40 mph, and their strict enforcement is even more important than before.
 On the other hand, mobile service is curiously much stronger here than on many other parts of the route, for example, the Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German pastries are rather good, and in Bavaria, they are very rich and varied, similar to those of their neighbor to the south, Austria.
 Fruit pastries are common: apples are cooked and baked all year, while cherries and plums pop their heads up in the summer.
 Many German bakery products also contain almonds, hazelnuts and other nuts, and popular cakes often marry particularly well with a cup of strong coffee.
 If you want small but copious pastries, try the Berlin balls, also called Berliner, Pfannkuchen or Krapfen depending on the region.
 A curry is a dish made with herbs and spices, accompanied by meat or vegetables.
 A curry dish can be solid or liquid, depending on the amount of sauce it contains.
 In the inner regions of northern India and Pakistan, yogurt is commonly used in curries, while in the south of India and certain other coastal regions of the subcontinent, coconut milk is commonly used.
 Indonesia, with its 17,000 islands, is a generic term that covers a wide variety of regional cuisines present throughout the country.
 However, when this term is used without other qualifying adjectives, it tends to designate foods from the central and eastern parts of the main island of Java.
 Now widely available throughout the archipelago, Javanese cuisine offers a range of simply seasoned dishes, the predominant flavors Javanais preferring being peanuts, chili peppers, sugar, and various aromatic spices.
 The stirrups are supports for the rider's feet, which hang from each side of the saddle.
 They offer a greater stability to the user, but they can pose a security problem: in fact, the user's feet can get stuck in them.
 If a rider is projected from a horse but has a foot caught in the stirrup, he could be dragged if the horse runs away.
 Firstly, most riders wear riding boots with a heel and a fairly narrow and smooth sole.
 Some saddles, notably English saddles, have safety bars that allow a stirrup to fall from the saddle if it is pulled back by a rider who falls.
 Vallée de Cochamó – The destination of excellence for climbing in Chile, known as the Yosemite of South America, with many different large granite walls and cliffs.
 From the high summits, the panoramas over the mountains are unimaginable. Alpinists from all over the world never cease to discover new paths on the slopes, where the possibilities are unlimited.
 Winter sports, including skiing and snowboarding, are popular sports that consist of sliding down a snowy slope with skis or a snowboard attached to the feet.
 Skiing is a major travel activity that counts many aficionados, sometimes called ski bums, who organize their entire vacations around skiing in specific locations.
 The idea of skiing is very ancient: some rock paintings showing skiers date back to 5,000 years BC.
 Alpine skiing as a sport dates back at least to the seventeenth century, the first ski club was founded in Australia in 1861 by Norwegians.
 Ski touring, also called Nordic skiing, ski de fond or ski touring,
 This resembles Alpine skiing, as well as Alpinism, without, however, incorporating these activities, which are practiced on accidented terrain and which require the use of much more rigid skis and boots.
 Think of the ski route as a similar hiking route.
 In good conditions, you can cover a little bit more distance than on foot, but you'll rarely reach the speeds of cross-country skiing without a heavy backpack on damaged pistes.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but comprising many independent countries, in classical circumstances, travelling through several countries implies having to make several visa applications and undergo several passport checks.
 Schengen space, however, functions a little bit like a single country in this regard.
 As long as you stay within this zone, you can generally cross borders without repassing through passport control points.
 Likewise, having a Schengen visa, you do not need to separately apply for a visa for each of the member countries of the space, which saves time, money and administrative formalities.
 There is no universal definition of what constitutes an antiquity. Some tax bodies define antiquities as goods over 100 years old.
 The criteria vary depending on where one is located, in some parts of the world, like in North America, the age limit may be lower than in Europe.
 Handmade products can be considered antiques, even if they are less old than similar industrial products.
 Reindeer herding is an important means of subsistence for the Sami, and the culture that surrounds this trade is of great importance to many other professions.
 Even though, according to tradition, all Sami were not involved in large-scale reindeer herding, they lived off fishing, hunting and other similar activities, while using reindeer mainly as draft animals.
 Today, many Sámi people practice modern trades. Tourism is a major source of income in Lapland, the Sámi region.
 Although very widely used, particularly among non-Roms, the term Gitan is often considered pejorative due to its association with negative stereotypes and a misrepresented image of the Roma people.
 If the country you are travelling to has a travel warning issued by your government, your travel insurance or your cancellation insurance may be affected.
 You can also use the advice of other governments, but their advice is tailored to their citizens.
 As an example, American citizens in the Middle East might be confronted with situations different from those of Europeans or Arabs.
 Opinions are only a brief summary of a country's political situation.
 The opinions presented are often superficial, general and too simplified compared to the more detailed information available elsewhere.
 Violent weather is the generic term for any dangerous meteorological phenomenon susceptible of causing damage, grave social upheaval or loss of human life.
 Weather conditions can occur anywhere in the world, and they can be of several kinds, depending on geographic, topographic, and atmospheric characteristics.
 Violent winds, hail, excessive rainfall and fires are forms and effects of violent weather, just like thunderstorms, tornadoes, marine storms and cyclones.
 Extreme weather phenomena, regional and seasonal, include cold storms, blizzards with high winds, and sand or dust storms.
 It is strongly advised that travellers research the risks of bad weather that may affect their destination, knowing that this can have an impact on the itineraries they envisage.
 Anyone who envisages going to a country that could be considered a war zone should receive professional training.
 A search on the Internet for a course in hostile environment will probably provide the address of a local company.
 A course will normally cover all the questions covered here in much more detail, generally with practical experience.
 A formation normally lasts from 2 to 5 days and includes role-playing, a lot of first aid, and sometimes training in the handling of weapons.
 Books and magazines dealing with survival in the wilderness are common, but publications dealing with war zones are few.
 Travellers who plan to have a sex change operation abroad should ensure that they have valid documents for their return journey.
 The willingness of governments to deliver passports with the sex not indicated (X) or updated documents to correspond to the name and sex desired varies.
 The willingness of foreign governments to honor these documents is all too variable.
 Searches at security checkpoints have also become much more intrusive in the era of post-September 11, 2001.
 Transsexual people in pre-operative phase should not expect to pass scanners while preserving their privacy and dignity.
 The rip currents are the currents that come back from the waves that break on the beach, often on a reef or equivalent.
 Due to the topography of the seafloor, the return flow is concentrated on a few deeper sections, and a rapid current can form there.
 In most cases, deaths are due to exhaustion resulting from an attempt to swim against the current, which can be impossible.
 As soon as you get out of the current, the return to swimming is not more difficult than usual.
 Try to aim for a place where you will not be caught again. It is possible also, depending on your skills and whether you have been spotted or not, you may want to wait for the rescue.
 The reinsertion shock occurs earlier than the cultural shock (the honeymoon phase is less long), lasts longer and can be more severe.
 Travelers who have had a hard time adjusting to the new culture have sometimes had a hard time adjusting to their culture of origin.
 When you return home after living abroad, you are already adapted to the new culture and have lost some habits of your culture of origin.
 At first, when you went abroad, people were probably patient and understanding, knowing that travelers in a new country must adapt.
 People may not anticipate that patience and understanding are also necessary for travelers returning home.
 The sound and light show at the pyramid is one of the most interesting attractions in the region for children.
 You can see the pyramids in the dark and you can see them in silence before the show begins.
 Usually, you always hear the noise of tourists and vendors. The history of sound and light is like a history book.
 The Sphinx is placed as the backdrop and narrator of a long history.
 The scenes are displayed on the pyramids and the different pyramids are lit.
 The Shetland Islands, discovered in 1819, are claimed by several nations and possess the greatest number of research stations, sixteen of which are active in 2020.
 The archipelago is located 120 km north of the peninsula, and the island of King George, with the village of Villa Las Estrellas, is the largest.
 Other examples include Livingston and Deception Island, where the caldera flooded by an active volcano offers a spectacular natural harbor.
 Ellsworth Land is the Southern region of the peninsula, bounded by the Bellingshausen Sea.
 The mountains of the peninsula merge into the plateau, then reappear to form the Ellsworth mountain chain, 360 km long and traversed by the Minnesota glacier.
 The northern part, or Sentinel chain, contains the highest mountains of Antarctica, the Vinson massif, which reaches 4,892 m.
 In remote places, without cell phone networks, you may have no other choice than to use satellite telephony.
 A satellite phone generally does not replace a cell phone, because you have to be outside and have a clear view of the satellite to make a call.
 It's a service often used by shipping, including pleasure craft, as well as by expeditions that have data transmission and telephone needs.
 Your local telephone operator should be able to tell you more about connecting to this service.
 Those who plan a sabbatical year have the possibility of learning while traveling, and more and more of them choose this possibility.
 This formula is particularly appreciated by young people who leave school, as it allows them to take a year off before university, without compromising their studies.
 Often, having taken a gap year abroad can actually give you better chances of getting into higher education in your home country.
 In general, there is a fee to pay for these educational programs.
 Finland is a choice destination for pleasure boating, with thousands of lakes and thousands of islands in the lakes and coastal archipelagos.
 You don't necessarily need a yacht in the archipelagoes and on the lakes.
 Although the coastal archipelagos and the larger lakes are actually quite large enough for a yacht, smaller boats or even a kayak offer a different experience.
 Sailing is a national pastime in Finland, with one boat for every seven or eight people.
 Norway, Sweden and New Zealand are in the same situation, but apart from that, it's a unique case (in the Netherlands, for example, the figure is one to forty).
 Most Baltic cruises feature a prolonged stay in St Petersburg, Russia.
 This means you can visit the historic city for a few days, then return to the boat at night.
 If you only visit with cruise excursions, you do not need a separate visa (as of 2009).
 Berlin, Germany, is mentioned in some brochures for cruises, as you can see by consulting the map above, Berlin is not at all near the sea, and no visit to Berlin is included in the price of the cruise.
 Flying can be a scary experience for people of all ages and backgrounds, especially if they have never flown before or have experienced a traumatic event.
 It's not different from the fears and the personal fears that many people have about other things.
 For some, understanding something about how airplanes work and what happens during a flight can help overcome a fear that is based on the unknown or not having control.
 Transportation companies are well rewarded for making rapid deliveries. Often, in the context of an urgent repair, the question of time is crucial for the documents, goods or spare parts involved.
 On some routes, the big companies have their own planes, but on other routes and for small companies, there has been a problem.
 If they had sent goods by air freight, on certain routes, it would have taken days to pass the unloading and customs.
 The only way to get it there faster was to send it as registered baggage. Airline regulations do not allow them to send a bag without a passenger, and that's where you come in.
 The most obvious way to travel first class or business class is to pay a large sum of money for this privilege (or, better yet, to ask your company to do it for you).
 However, this is not cheap: in general, you can expect to pay up to four times the normal economy fare for business class, and eleven times for first class.
 In general, it is useless to try to get reductions for seats in first or business class on direct flights from A to B.
 Airlines know very well that they can count on a certain type of traveller who is willing to pay very high prices for the privileges of speed and comfort, and they set their fares accordingly.
 The capital of Moldova is Chişinău. The local language is Romanian, but Russian is very widespread.
 Moldova is a Multi-Ethnic Republic that suffers from ethnic conflicts.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the creation of the self-proclaimed Republic of Transnistria in eastern Moldova, with its own government and currency, but recognized by no United Nations member state.
 Economic ties have been reestablished between these two parts of Moldavia despite the failure of political negotiations.
 The main religion in Moldova is Orthodox Christianity.
 With a population of 3.7 million, Izmir is Turkey's third largest city, the second port after Istanbul, and an excellent platform for correspondence.
 This was the ancient city of Smyrna, which is today a modern, developed, and thriving commercial center, set around a huge Bay, surrounded by mountains.
 The wide boulevards, the glass buildings and modern shopping centers are dotted with traditional red-tiled roofs, the market of the eighteenth century, and old mosques and churches, although the city has an atmosphere more reminiscent of Mediterranean Europe than traditional Turkey.
 The village of Haldarsvik offers views over the neighbouring island of Eysturoy and houses an unusual octagonal church.
 In the cemetery, one finds interesting marble sculptures representing doves on certain tombs.
 It is worth while to walk for half an hour through this fascinating village.
 The romantic and fascinating town of Sintra, situated to the north, is easily accessible and has been made famous to foreigners by the glowing recital of its splendor by Lord Byron.
 The bus 403 of Scotturb regularly goes to Sintra, with a stop at Cabo da Roca.
 On your way north, do not miss the superb sanctuary of Notre-Dame de Fatima, a world-famous place for the apparitions of Mary.
 Remember that you are visiting essentially a charnel house, a site that has almost incalculable significance for a large part of the world's population.
 There are still many women and men alive who survived their stay here, and many others who saw their relatives murdered or killed by forced labour, Jews or non-Jews indifferently.
 Please treat the site with all the dignity, solemnity and respect it deserves.
 Do not deface the site by marking or scratching graffiti on the structures.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish. About half of the inhabitants prefer to speak Catalan, a large majority understand it, and practically everyone is capable of speaking Spanish.
 However, most of the signs are only in Catalan, as the law establishes that it is the first official language.
 Spanish is also widely used in public transport and other installations.
 Regular announcements in the Metro are made only in Catalan, but unscheduled disruptions are announced by an automated system in many languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic, and Japanese.
 Parisians have the reputation of being egocentric, rude and arrogant.
 Although this stereotype is often inaccurate, the best way to get along in Paris remains to behave as well as possible, to act like someone who is well-bred.
 The abrupt exteriors of the Parisians evaporate rapidly if you show a minimum of courtesy.
 The National Park of Plitvice Lakes is densely wooded, principally of beech, fir and pine, and presents a mixture of alpine and Mediterranean vegetation.
 The country possesses a great variety of plant communities due to the diversity of its microclimates, soils and altitude levels.
 The region is also home to a very large variety of animal and bird species.
 Rare animals such as the European Brown bear, the Wolf, the Eagle, the Owl, the Lynx, the Wildcat and the great Tetra can be seen there, as well as many other common species.
 When visiting a monastery, women must wear skirts covering their knees and have their shoulders equally covered.
 Most monasteries provide stoles to women who arrive without anything, but if you bring yours, and it wears bright colors, you'll get a smile from the monk or nun at the entrance.
 Men are required to wear pants that cover the knees.
 You can also borrow this garment from the stock at the entrance, but as it is not laundered after each use, you may not feel comfortable wearing these skirts.
 Majorcan cuisine, like that of similar areas of the Mediterranean, is based on bread, vegetables and meat, especially pork, and uses olive oil.
 A simple and popular dinner, especially in summer, is Pa amb Oli: bread with olive oil, tomato and any condiments available, such as cheese, tuna, etc.
 All names, followed by the word Sie, which means you, begin with a capital letter, even in the middle of a sentence.
 This is a great way to distinguish between certain verbs and objects.
 It can also be said to facilitate reading, although the writing is somewhat complicated by the need to know whether a verb or an adjective is used in a substantivized form.
 The pronunciation is relatively easy in Italian, because most words are pronounced exactly as they are written.
 The main letters to watch are c and g, because their pronunciation varies depending on the following vowel.
 Please also make sure to pronounce the r and rr in a distinct manner: caro means cher, while carro means chariot.
 Persian has a relatively easy and mostly regular grammar.
 Therefore, reading this introduction to grammar would help you to learn a lot about Persian grammar and to better understand the phrases.
 It goes without saying that if you know a Romance language, it will be easier for you to learn Portuguese.
 However, those who speak a little Spanish might conclude hastily that Portuguese is close enough that it need not be studied separately.
 Pre-Modern observatories are generally obsolete today, and remain in place as museums or sites of education.
 As light pollution at their time was not as preoccupant as it is today, they are generally situated in cities or on campuses, more accessible than those built at the modern time.
 Most modern research telescopes are enormous infrastructures placed in remote regions where atmospheric conditions are favorable.
 The contemplation of cherry blossoms, known as hanami, has been part of Japanese culture since the eighth century.
 The concept came from China where the plum blossom was the flower of predilection.
 In Japan, the first Cherry Blossom festivals were organized by the Emperor solely for himself and other members of the close aristocracy around the Imperial court.
 Plants wear their best appearance when they are in a natural environment, so resist the temptation to remove even one.
 If you visit a strictly manicured garden, the taking of specimens will also get you expelled without discussion.
 Singapore is generally considered to be an extremely safe place, where it is very easy to move around, and where you can buy almost anything you need once you arrive.
 But situated in the high tropics, only a few degrees north of the equator, you will have to adapt to the heat (always) and to a strong solar radiation (when the sky is clear, which is more rare).
 There are also a few buses that go north to Hebron, the traditional burial place of the Biblical patriarchs, Abraham, Isaac, Jacob and their wives.
 Check that the bus you are planning to take goes to Hebron and not just to the nearby Jewish settlement of Kyriat Arba.
 Inland waterways can be an excellent theme for vacations.
 For example, visiting chateaux in the Loire Valley, the Rhine Valley or taking a cruise to interesting sites on the Danube or Erie Canal.
 They also define the routes for popular hiking and biking trails.
 Noel is one of the most important holidays of the Christian faith, it celebrates the birth of Jesus.
 Many traditions linked to these festivals have also been adopted by non-believers in Christian countries and by non-Christians worldwide.
 It is traditional to spend Easter night awake at a place in the open to see the sunrise.
 There are, of course, Christian theological explanations for this tradition, but it may well be a pre-Christian rite of spring and fertility.
 Traditional churches often organize a Paschal Vigil on Saturday night during the Easter weekend, with congregations often bursting into the feast at midnight to celebrate the resurrection of Christ.
 All animals that have arrived on these Islands have done so originally by water, by swimming or by floating objects, or by air.
 Because of the great distance that separates them from the continent, mammals have not been able to go the whole way, making the giant tortoise the main grazing animal of the Galapagos.
 Since the arrival of man in the Galapagos, many mammals have been introduced, including goats, horses, cows, rats, cats and dogs.
 If you visit the Arctic or Antarctic regions in winter, you may discover the polar night, during which the sun never rises above the horizon.
 It's a good opportunity to admire the Aurora Borealis, because the sky will be dark practically all day.
 As the regions are sparsely populated, and light pollution is therefore often not a problem, you will also be able to enjoy the stars.
 Japanese culture is more hierarchical and formal than the one Westerners may be used to.
 The costumes are classic work uniforms, and the collaborators are called by their first name or by their function.
 Harmony in the workplace is crucial, as it emphasizes collective effort rather than the praise of individual achievements.
 Workers must often obtain the agreement of their superiors for any decision they make and are supposed to obey instructions from their superiors without questioning them.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.39891861120358457, 'precisions': [0.692889742973817, 0.46236334807644164, 0.3297464494205803, 0.23972290584267614], 'brevity_penalty': 1.0, 'length_ratio': 1.010396019578496, 'translation_length': 24978, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 65.22978938432709, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2}